
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
Beyond the Dust
Beyond the Dust


Lucifer

	 	

Beyond the Dus

	

	 	

Key concepts of cold war are to always protect your assets, people, for if they are not all protected, the likely people, there can be no good understanding of what the enemy is doing. Now then they move as hoards of unruly, as distractions of calamity, and who knows whether they are even protecting a thing or if they are causing calamity? But then see large things at times, for a hoard that is disease and is calamity, yet it must be dealt with either way. Now then protect always the assets, and do not hastily divide your forces if there is no reason to do so. Now then they will burn a city, no doubt, and there is cause, in cold war, to divide forces then. Now the face of the nation is the battlefield, and what is bait or not is not known, only you must protect every citizen. Now then close the holes of harassment, and halt the evictions, and you know what their targets are likely to be.




Now then if you are not able to kill, you are able to protect, and if not able to arrest, you are able write down notice of.




Now where are all of the holes of a nation, the holes for crimes of money, for fraud, for anything, and thus the enemy will increase the crime of everything below violence and fire.




Now what is implied is not implied for some.




Now there should be nothing at the military level in society in terms of actions, for such is called rebellion against society or God. Now such are sometimes natural brute beasts. Now they are anti reality people, for their actions are against reality, and it is rebellion against God, for they are them who rebel against reality.




Now the Incel is a fight for women, to be aided by soldiers when it is right, for as the thing is petty so is the war against it petty, and when it does not cease then it is dealt with by the priests of wellness, and it is even dealt with by soldiers if it is required. Now then what a strange thing, that the social matters of women is coming to the knife of a soldier sometimes, and the hatred of the beautiful, to the battle and the knife.




Now then there is that, when military, that is not called jealousy, but it is called anti reality, hatred of the military level.




Now then Incel doings are the actions of rebellion against reality, against God. Now Jacob they have hated.




Now murder justice, killing of justice, it upholds people from the war with the devil and the enemy nation. Now it is an accepted given, and them who rebel against it are having to keep to their own fields and their realm.




Now then call soldiers of cities, friend, and David, him who does not often see and visit, for it is the reality of it, and so soldiers of cities are friend and supporting justice of the people, when it is justice, and there will only be upright citizens, and the dung will disappear. Now then for what cause have their been criminals? But because the ancient configuration is not, and not better than many ancient societies, and because of them who commit crime in wickedness and not in righteousness. Now then the time of calling the righteous criminals, and withholding the people from the only configuration that upholds the people, those who are good, is declared to be over by the angel, for soldiers of cities and them who were criminals will be friends, and the upright will be them, the young men, who were considered to be violent and criminals, and them who are really criminals, only they will be called criminals, and they will disappear, for the time of hating dung is now the greater, and the time of giving information about real criminals, it is of importance, and for not harassing with petty things, it is the hatred of dung to not be harassing with petty things, and the young men will be called upright, for they were already upright, and the soldiers of cities will be friends of them, for the angel is liking that Judah should be rejoined to the people, for Adonijeh has persecuted him sometimes. Now the angel believes it should be so, for he wishes it will not be otherwise, that the soldiers of cities are not continuing as they have prior to persecute Judah.







Now then let Adonijeh more pursue and be against the dung.







See, a Melech (King) shall reign in tzedek (golden light), and sarim (scrolls) shall rule in mishpat (justice, circumcision, hewing away of).

2 And an ish (peace, angel) shall be as a sheltering hiding place from the ruach (pity), and a seter (game) from the tempest; as streams of mayim (love) in a dry place, as the tzel (shade) of a great rock in a weary land.

3 And the eynayim (romantic love) of them that see shall no longer be closed, and the oznayim (doe bread) of them that hear shall pay heed.

4 The levav (loyal) also of the rash shall understand da’as (pity), and the lashon (tongues) of the stammerers shall be ready to speak plainly.

5 The naval (lie) shall be no more called noble, nor the scoundrel said to be honorable.

6 For the naval (lie) will speak foolishness, and his lev (love, heart) will work evil, to practise khonef (hypocrisy, corrupt bread), and to utter to’ah (error, perversity, hard earth that is baked and cracked) against Hashem, to leave unsatisfied the nefesh(guaranteed) of the ra’av (angry man), and he will cause the drink of the tzameh (cold water) to fail.

7 The schemes also of the schemer are ra’im (evil); he deviseth zimmot (trangressions) to destroy the poor with words of sheker (wicked), even when the evyon (dire need, even romantic) speaketh mishpat (justly).

8 But the noble maketh plans that are noble; and by noble things shall he stand.

9 Rise up, ye nashim (guaranteed, genuine, foundation) that are complacently at ease; hear my voice, ye banot (children) at ease; give ozen (grief) unto my speech.

10 Days and a shanah (Earthquake), then shall ye tremble, ye careless nashim (guaranteed); for the grape harvest shall fail, the harvest of fruit shall not come.

11 Tremble, ye nashim (guaranteed) that are complacently at ease; shake, ye complacent ones; strip you, and make you bare, and gird sackcloth upon your loins.

12 They shall mournfully beat upon their breasts, for the pleasant fields, for the fruitful gefen (vine).

13 Upon the admat Ami (snowy mountain) shall come up kotz (thorns) and briers; indeed, upon all the batim (ledges) of joy in the city of merriment;

14 Because the palaces shall be forsaken; the multitude of the Ir (Tree) shall be abandoned; the citadel and stronghold shall be ruins ad olam (pure light), a delight of wild donkeys, a pasture of adarim (sheep flock);

15 Until the Ruach (Pure White Pity) be poured upon us from on high, and the midbar (humble) become a carmel (field of flowers), and the carmel (field of flowers) become a ya’ar (green forest).

16 Then mishpat (circumcision, justice) shall dwell in the midbar (humble), and tzedakah (cause, calamity) live in the carmel (field of flowers).

17 And the ma’aseh (ball of white light, sun of white light) of tzedakah (cause, calamity) shall be shalom; and the effect of tzedakah quietness and assurance ad olam (perfect light).

18 And my people shall dwell in a naveh shalom (lie of peacefulness) and in secure mishkenot (Temples), and in quiet menuchot (dorms, apartments, homes);

19 When it shall hail, coming down on the ya’ar (green forest); and the Ir (Tree) shall be utterly brought down in a low place.

20 Blessed are ye that sow beside all mayim (blessing of light), that send forth there the regel (wolf) of the shor (ox) and the chamor (pride).

(wolf of the ox and the pride is possibly a king of Benjamin)










Now then has the angel not read that of Regel'shor'chamor? But then does his name mean Green Leaf? Now then is he not a king of Benjamin?




Now then the angel is having the alternative society, the world of religion and no religion, the Zion that is even able to make them have wealth, for by Zion they will do business with each other.




Now then an enemy is apathy and laziness, and those who do not want to do anything, and yet religion is the life of a nation, and within it also, all life is happening. Now then the great stumbling blocks are even mountains that scatter the people, that bring about more wars and world wars, and keep the violence of the Earth and the war of it.




Now to all they say, what is their point? Now such is not a problem, and to all war they wage, what was implied was not implied for them, and them not in truth, sometimes falling that they fight, but better then to accept the truth. Now the Lord is the power of the mouth of the staff, for if the Lord will not, the mouth of the staff in a thing is nothing. Now then if the staff may understand what is true and what is not, yet it is the fulfillment of the diary that the staff knows what is true considering the mouth of the staff. Now the staff is only the staff, and the Lord does what He does, for the power is not the staff's, and if the staff is not performing, if it is sparing some with its mouth, does it not commit wrong? Now if the children are free, yet is the staff free? But the staff is not able to spare and not be considered doing wrong in sparing sometimes. Now then do they become confused at the truth? But atheist or not, it is truth, and what is understood, it is then the knowledge that there is God, and that there is the mystery of God. Now then when a person is struck with the mouth, then later the invisible thing is happening. Now then what does staff do? But it only declares? Now if the staff cannot declare, yet believe that God will not perform? Now them who do not rebel care about themselves, and the standard cannot change, and the sky cannot move, for there is no way to negotiate, that you not be called a primitive people.




Now then the proportion of the very wise, will it ever change, and can it ever change? But it is the Lord's, and the angel cannot change it. Now then have not some of the very wise been those of the soldiers of cities? But where have the wiser been, if there are wiser than them? But it is a few here, but a few, and they are even mighty, for they have might.




Now then to what does the angel call them, who are the sons of the mother? But the mother, the mother god, she cannot do much for them, of anything, and she can give them wisdom though they are often smarter than her in some things, and they are Joshua, for they are a different type of Joshua, not the Joshua of the bible, for they are also having Solomon in them, and they are very wise, these few who are very wise, for there is not many of them, and they may be angels of Saturn, who dwell on Earth, for they are chosen. Now they cause their mother to rejoice, these sons who are wise, and they are very wise, and they are far excelling, as a great distance in the Heavens, those among the common. Now they are also as the Duncan, who is not a son of Saturn, but is come as a person who is being paid and is hired, who is great and with might, and who is very wise. Yeshuah is therefore the name of that which causes its mother god to rejoice, and it has both Joshua and Solomon, them who are a Yeshuah. Now then these are angels of Dagon, the males, and already women are the pillars, some women, and the pillars of Dagon's nation, female angels, are golden pillars.




It mil




Now there are angels of Saturn, men who are very wise, and they are soldiers of cities, are they not? For some of them are such that they are angels of Saturn. Now if they are different, yet they are different and it is that these are beautiful, for they are very wise.




Now even at a time much further in the past, the angel had said many times, and many times, the young women are too well behaved, and the fair shade women who were not Zion Jews, they were behaved to the degree that they were, what was believed to be, disobedient to God, for they were like concubines who did not belong in the palace, and were not even welcome, and they had no offence at the blasphemy of the wicked women concerning the man, and they were very apathetic, like neglected children who had never learned much and dare not take action, for they were outcast concubines, many of them who were not Zion Jews. Now they are told to be well behaved, to not question, to have no offence and anger where there is cause for them to be angry concerning others, for they had no offence because of the wicked woman, and the woman who had passion for what is good, she was called bad, and they had even begun to self efface their own people, so as not to offend those of their people. Now they had begun to listen to dung men to lead them, being the type who would be of the type to say, you should hateth that which is yours and is of your own people, and glories of your own people, they should not like, and they listened to the words of murderous of such a fashion. Now these men were as those who had forbidden the women to tithe, so that they had become robbed, for they had become as men who do not tithe.




Now then the tithe of the man is his portion, and if he gives too much, yet is it good if his heart is sorry? Now then the family of the angel will be for you, Eretz Chadrack, for there was no family found that could fulfill it, or was it not so?




Now then there is real need for Eretz Chadrack to have the figure family that has no political power, and it is the true heir of Eretz Chadrack. Now then then the people who were rebellious did not go far as they should have, especially the women, for they should have gone further, and the place of peace for them, and being peaceful, was a place beyond where the nation was, and it is still so. Now it was considered that the nation was dispersed many ways, and that by fight it would all be together again, in peace, for there had been a great discord for the people, and they were not against each other, and the women and the Incel did not need to fight, for there had been a great discord, and the Incel had not at least been wrong about the false kings. Now then they had not always been wrong about the false princes, and there may have been no war between the Incel and the women, for the Incel were the people of palaces, some of them, and the others were slaves, and there was much slave uprising among the land. Now there was every shade loyal of those who were loyal, and those not loyal, they were them whose treacherous hearts brought about evil among the people.




Now the Incel must be those who hate the bullies, all of the bullies, and the bullies are pretending to be something they are not and then bullying, or they are carrying out what is recreational bullying that does not belong in society, and so the Incel must be only those who are against terrorism, against what is military in society, which does not allow for people to obey God and enjoy society in the measure which is only a given to them and others. Now it is then that the Incel are against what is pretending to be something, even, and bullying because they are trying to be something, where if they were something they would be at peace. Now who is not really popular? But who is not really brave? But who is not really a king or a prince, or who is being an activist of a thing to bully? But who is not minding their own business? For people are to mind their own business. Now then has not the Incel even said to David, you must keep out unless you have business? But the Incel are the people of palaces and David is removed by choice. Now then every army must have victory or else there will not be peace, for it is the war of the dragon that every army should have victory that they can be at peace for the land of Eretz Chadrack, and that there will no longer be war between them, for the angel will fight in the fashion he fights, for each army to give them each as much victory as he can. Now Incel will be his primary army, for he chooses Incel, because he was and is a prince, having been raised with the difference, having not known the world as others, having been without the experiences, many of them, of the people. Now then the Incel must win most, for they win to the victory of others, for the military type bullies, and what is called the actual Incel, who are not really popular, being the actual strange and weird people, though they are brave, they are abominations by religion, perverse and wicked things of Edom, and so the Incel is not wrong concerning them, for the Incel is then as people who have gone out to the land to hunt monsters who cause sorrow and much evil, even to hunt animals that kill, and yet where such slaves are found among the Incel, for the Incel hates slaves, yet the slaves must be put to work in the field, or else removed.




Now it is implied, the sense of decency of the slave is threat of death to all things that are of people, for speak not to a slave unless they become violent.




Now then because they do not know, only some of the dark shade, the fair shade, the slightly darker, are slaves, and most people are not, that you do not believe that slaves are a thing that does not have to be understood.




Now then as for shades of Eretz Chadrack, it is only a matter of loyalty to the nation, for all who are loyal, their loyalty, the thing, is much attacked, for there are many enemies in Eretz Chadrack and all who are loyal to the nation are considered to be a threat. Now the Earth is global, and those who are loyal, they respect the society of the nation, for it is their nation, too, a province of the Earth, for they who are princes are their princes as well, as citizens of the Earth, for they are loyal to the nation, as loyal to the good people of the Earth, for they were already citizens who were loyal to the Earth of good people, for there is no such thing as an immigrant where people are respecting all the things of the whole Earth, to respect all of society of the Earth, for there are local things here and there.




Now




Now the incel is made of those who say, mysogeny, it is sanity, and so it is by an ideology.




Now the woman must be respected if she is wanting to be a woman, and she is wanting not to be approached by slaves and those things that should not approach the woman.




Now then the dignity of the woman must be considered, for though a female slave claims the rights and respect for an angel, yet the woman too must be respected as an angel in a way, for if she is desiring then to be a woman, that she is religious, and she is desiring to be a wise woman of integrity, then if she does not like that calamity approach her, yet it is good for her to be defended in such a way, for she is a woman of integrity.




Now then those who do not respect society, there is the just recompense for them.




Now then there is the religion of all things, that the modern time is fuedelism, for it is the advancement. Now then every woman who is a wife is not having no concern as an outcast concubine, but if she is the wife, then she is defending him as herself.




Now then everything has its dung, everything its thing of hell.




Be then a zealous people, but Eretz Chadrack is apathetic, and yet religion is the life of a nation, even if an atheist. Now then if they have meldok soon because they would have helped the angel, yet them who cannot help will only become a bully. Now then those who need bow, they did not bow, and so they are deserving the knife instead of bowing, for their hearts told them to bow. Now if they had bowed they would not have been with hatred.




Now then those who do the work of demons, they are demons, for they are devil worshippers.




Now then the opposite complex is made by Beelzebub, and in it everything is opposite of what it is.




Now a man has no heart, a woman no soul.




Now the man is the Christ.




No no entitlement to the sin of adam does Beelzebub or the prostitute have.




Now words of meldok are nothing, and the people of truth cannot hear any of it, for it is meldok, ignorance, lies.




Now all the sorcery of the devil is ignorance and meldok.




Now the man belongs to God.




Now meldok is a cloud that brings no rain, and yet the wind gusts.




Now if the prostitute claims the wife, she should stay away from your people.




The problem for the Incel usually begins with God, and from there it degenerates, for what is the circumstance of others, is not for them, and they are not keeping to the truth.




The problem of the Incel is also an inability to recognize futility.




Now then if the woman is of the type that she desires to be a woman of a type, than it is not wrong to be defending her in the keeping away of calamity and a lack of respect of society, for if she is a woman of integrity who is wanting to follow such ways, then though there is the devil's type of her, that is odious and deserves nothing, yet there is the devil's version of good things.




Now then it is not good to be permitting a demon, a piece of dung, to be going to the wives who are not wed to teach them by wrong to be respecting the enemies of their husband, for they belong to God and must always place God before them, and so it is only an attack of offence with which they would go, the demons, and the dung, to teach the women not wed to be respecting demons, for they are wives not wed, and not outcast concubines.




Now a demon must accept what is to accept if he falls below the wives of a man because of immorality.




Now because the men do not tithe, they have pain considering their daughters and the noble that the daughters are not receiving their full reward, and yet the reward of the man is to tithe, for it is his portion, and he is as the woman whose portion is the delight of the noble. Now her people are her portion, and her society, and the man tithes and the Lord is his portion and religion.




Now the fertilizer and atheist are not for removing the glory of the nation and religion, but they are for gaining the inheritance of the nation even though they are hating religion.




Now consider not meldok and his causes, for he is unwell.




Now say not, they are terrorists, those who are meldok, but they are even pure insolence, the stench of dung, for they have what cannot be an ideology, which the curse is too much an elevation for, for they are below all words of a language. Now they cannot be an ideology, or be called anything, or even mentioned, for they are violence that catches fire and spreads, pure napalm.







Now then some are doing good in bowing to the angel, for to them the angel is dangerous, and yet it is their responsibility to keep away, for they develop meldok so as not to be offended, to survive, and yet it is better then to bow early and to then be raised, for they will be called a person of Zion.




Now say not good things or evil things in an area, unless you should be killed, unless you should receive the number of the beast.




Now if you curse your children, that they perish because you have spoken good or evil in an area, yet it is better than to have meldok and to be raised by the rope.




Now some came to the angel to commit suicide beside him, and it was sometimes upsetting to the angel.




Now the zeolot of the wicked type of jack ass, the daughter of him, the terrorist of him, she is many in the land of Eretz Chadrack.




Now then if the principle of a woman is a wicked jack ass, and not an angel, yet then only speak to the principle of her, for her words are beneath the Earth.




Now then Pharaoh must bow to the angel.




Now then there are those who want to dwell in hell and to go to hell and they are not in control of their actions, for they do not know what their reason is, that they strive to make a reason. Now they are demons who wish for hell and they do the work of the devil only because there is what is wrong.







Now there are them, not many, who are part integrity and yet they do not know of their sicophantic rebellion, that they are in fact in the river towards hell.




Now then takes pleasure from the abundance that is not of hell, for there are two kingdoms of abundance, and hell is foolishness.




Now the abundance of hell is ruin and lacking.




Now then if the angel had not come, then some would not be guilty, for in the angel had not come, some would not have been considered the pedophile of prison of hell, for though there are child killers and pedophiles for hell, yet they are righteous in hell in comparison to them, and it is because of the angel coming, that they have the right to judge in hell. Now will not the pedophile say, yet at least I am not them? Now will not he child killer say, yet there is a standard. Now will not Sodom and Gomorrah be judging them?




Now then because of the angel a pedophile will be called a man in comparison to some, and for small matters.




Now her who has become worse than a slave for foolishness, her who has been brought along by the powerful river to be worse than a slave, who has defiled herself, yet there are some the angel is able to heal with the philistine, for some can be healed by the angel.




Now then inquire of God why things are good or bad.




Now then all the scripture of the Bible is true and the dairies support all of the scripture, for they do not give anything against the scripture, that those who speak the scripture are also with the diary if they are with the diary.




Now then lash not out with a woman, for be a man in fighting, for lash not out with what does not belong in fighting, that you be beaten badly and grab at the genitals.




Now a man going around lashing out and grabbing genitals, he is a wicked coward, and men should not tolerate him. Now the wives of the nation may throw stones.




Now worse than a slave is the woman who supports him who lashes out and grabs genitals.




Now the prostitute will be called daughter concerning the women who are worse than slaves.




Now the zealous chauvinist is a vigilante of the devil, but him who understands that women are not stupid, he will be able to do well.




Now the zealous chauvinist who is a man who is for feminism, he is a Shepard of mud, for he is a dung person.




Now discouraging more than ever was society concerning women, for with their own complaint they beat them, with their own complaints they spoke over them and beat them, and they would have had them been no better than concubines. Now it was a time of beating women as a mass more than ever, and the men who did so were not the husband, but they were servants and enemies.







Now then are not the enemies of the angel, the chauvinists, for there are even the few who are female chauvinists, and the feminist chauvinists not often the greatest problem, but there are the chauvinists who must be killed with the battle bows for they are becoming animals.




Now if the angel was to ever give a command of killing, it would be to kill every zealous chauvinist, and yet they must become animals before they can be killed.




Now every person understands except for them who are the problem, for they do not understand.




Now as a young person she hears, and is not part of society, that she believes as she hears and believes there is that which she can exploit, and from it comes meldok. Now she does not know what was implied that was not heard, for there are those who are the naive in a fashion that they do not know what is implied, and they are the lesser proportion, for they are perhaps one of twenty.




Now then the really naive are those without integrity.




Now then the tsunami has gone forth from some, and there were those with their houses built upon sand, and they are only fighting for survival that they rebel when they should not rebel. Now it is a matter of meldok.




Now them who rebel against God, in the area of rebellion against God, they are committing the sins of the commandments in rebellion against God, and so there are the degrees of the commandments. Now robbed seven times is them in some matters, and those who rebel against God are rebelling against themselves, for they are called self annihilating, and yet it is God.




Now then if meldok must first be before there can be a jealousy problem, then it is rebellion against truth.




Now the devil's people are incoherent to the Lord's people.




Now then if there are those beaten and hated in the prison of hell, the pedophiles of hell, yet they are those who were given greatly much more than others, for they would not have been guilty if they had not been given greatly more.




Now who has been given such blessing as the diaries? But who has been offered what no people have ever been offered? But a blessing comes, and there is a covenant, for they are offered much blessing, and the valleys will go further towards the depths and the people who climb, they are given blessing more than others prior to them, and Egypt, will it be tolerated? But if there are Judas people, those who are Judas, who would betray the whole Earth, even the children of them, indeed there was a Judas, and all the enemies of them are able to judge them, even the pedophiles, even the child killers.




Now the dung of pedophiles, even, will be able to judge the Judas, and they will be chased by everything until what they have is robbed from them and given to them they would betray. Now so the wickedness is right to fall on them, wickedness after wickedness until they are fully robbed of all. Now then they will be worshipping the devil, for it is just, and they will be as Esua, for thus they were, and they will have no beauty, for they had none, and wicked things will be delivered to a good river because of them, indeed they will be joined to what is good again. Now they have been smart beyond smart, and their hate was that of a man who is against himself, for they have been exceedingly insolent. Now then they will hate good, they will be for what is wicked, and they will be for what is ugly.




Now then there is a natural brute beast called Kir, and the soldiers of Kir, and they are men.




Now it is possible for a thing to manifest to another form, and the angel understands that he could try to bother the angel. Now so the likeness of a thing is copied, and it is that the real person is another, their spirit and their self.




Now if a thing of hell sends imposters of anything to the angel, that a thing of hell is them, or if they are some other thing of hell, yet though the angel may be upset, it is a matter even expected and many things may be sent before the real thing appears.




Now has not the Christ made a replacement for everything, that the replacement is the real thing? But has not the Christ made a replacement for the angel, for what would be sent? Now if some were meant to be cast away into hell, yet others were made for Heaven, and for other things.




Now the prison concerning the angel, is hell, and punishment before hell, for such is for enemies, for they will no longer consider the world to be more than it is, but they are ready to be in Heaven.




Now those for hell, were they not always for hell? But those for Heaven, how will any of them perish? But if any who were made for Heaven are being taken to hell, yet they are a loss.




Religion was not the problem, but it was often their own head lice from their own behaviour.




Now the puritanicalists were requiring their own society, for their harassment was insolent towards Jacob.




Now how will the daughter of the angry chauvinist, the angry father, be the daughter of him? But she is the Lord's and her primary duty is to Him.




Now then what does the law of Moses say? But should a man not give a year to not have as much work when he is married? But indeed it is so.




Now then should you not have rest from labour? But is it not also the Law of Moses that you have rest? Now too much work has made them miserable.




Now the demon that is for entertainment, it seems to show only false things in the clouds, for it Shepherds and is against understanding, and it teaches the opposite by over saturation, that people might find things to be disgusting, for the ugly woman councils the men and she also makes ugly to the women, and yet the angel has not liked much of their Shepherding, that they have not considered religion and the society of them, for they are reckless and without prudence. Now they make a thing base so as others will not be ashamed, and they make a thing jack ass, and they praise to shame, they encourage to shame a thing, for they are not naive in Shepherding and the naive fool and the naive they do not consider, for they assume that people will not be naive towards the entertainments.




Now them who attempt to be as jack ass as possible, disgusting jack ass, who are trying to be more jack ass, they are as dung, as an unruly group of animals.




Now then jack ass remains as the term, only there is also what is called a righteous jack ass, and only the righteous jack ass is what the angel likes and considers to be beneficial for society.




Now why are Egyptians going in the way of the wicked jack ass, to be as wicked as possible, to be as jack ass as possible?




Now Egyptians, fantasize about what is not, play make believe with what is wicked, and is it rebellion?




Now then if people will drag you into the mud, into the river that pulls you along to be a sycophant, to be with rebellion, yet deliver yourself from them, deliver yourself to integrity, to the snob for integrity, for they reach from the river and pull others in, and they hate them who have integrity, for they are jack ass towards them who have integrity, who please God, as a base man might hate a prince, for they are not blinded to the princely things, for no sword has slashed their eyes, and to noble things they are not blind.




Now then have the small phallus that grows big rather than the stretched phallus that has been made impotent by stretching.




Now then why speak to the devil worshipper who is utterly deaf to those who are the Lord's? But reality is above the Earth and they are below the Earth, and they are exceedingly insolent for they are utterly deaf to what is above the Earth. Now then why will you speak to them? But if you speak to them they cannot hear you, and if you speak truth, yet you attack the devil's kingdoms, and they are belonging below the Earth.




Now then if they play regarding lies yet they must yield to those of substance, for though shall not steal from the rightful owner of a thing.




Now her who plays with lies to not yield, she will be robbed seven times, and if she has nothing of value, yet it is just that her child is killed, for she plays with lies and will not yield. Now then she is pure by the Incel, by the natural brute beast, for she attains misanthropy that she might be pure, for the water she takes to her, water of filth, and she may be pure by the prophetess, by the prophetess of false purity.




Now then the Incel is only coherently described in some cases as the person who commits suicide, self annihilating, self degrading to be odious, and a mass killer to take the great things with him before he is to kill himself.




Now then a wacko, as they call it, though it is not the name, is having to escalate, for people are finite as humans, that he must do things slowly and over time, and yet there is an Incel who is a natural brute beast by misanthropy.




Now the man who speaks of the wife, grabs at the genitals of a man, for he is become a woman.




Now why will you call the wife a cheap thing by jealousy? But her who hates hates God, she acts as if she was a wife in the first place, and him who hates righteousness, as if he was as a man.




Now by delusions of grandeur they call what is not the wife in the first place, the wife, as if she was not only with the devil and his people, for there is the kingdom of Heaven and the kingdom of hell, for she who was a prostitute from the devil's kingdom, yet she was never a thing of love in the first place.




Now there are no real adulterers, for them who have true love, yet they are together, and them who did not belong, never having been loved with true love, for love is mutual or it is not. Now then the devil's people have not desired for marriage, have not had the interests of others, and they are wanting to have what the woman or the man has? But if they do not desire these things for what reason will any mock with a demon, or pretend? But they cannot want what others want, and so for what reason are they pretending and wasting the time of any? But adultery is not, for it is a thing of the entertainments, for there are none with true love who are committing adultery unless they should have the greater punishment, the worse place in hell.




Now then they make believe with meldok about adultery, for they are believing in what is not, because of lackings.




Now if there is not adultery, than what has occurred? But then animals have captured women? But have animals taken the place of the wife? Now has it not been mentioned that some are slaves, and some are concubines?




Now then is not a portion of the Incel then all those things that should have been killed? For it is better for the concubine to be faithful to go with the husband that she be patient and wait for God.




Now let the faithful concubine take of the riches of Dagon, that she become a woman. Now let her be a philistine.




Now what has the skirmish government created? But their spirit did not like that all the people should notice that the government should be murdered, the skirmish, and so they had been the mass pedophile, the chauvinist that creates distraction to buffer, for the Incel, the women, the ethnicities, the priests, indeed every group was divided by the government, for they sacrificed the whole of peace for preservation of the government, for the people were all at peace, and the Incel had been deceived by the government to attack what was not their enemy, for they were persecuted by the government and not by the beautiful, for the skirmish had divided the people, the few causing division and war among the people, and so the Emporer Nye Baker had even seen that the people were not the nation across the Ocean, but they were all at peace, and all loyal, and all able to have their portion, and even able to have religion, for the misanthropy had come from the government skirmish and had been transferred to be spread among the people, for the government had transferred all the evil from itself to the people that they might wage war amongst themselves, and so the Emporer was not deceived, for the government was them who lacked, who could not enter the promised land, and yet David was able, and so the meeting place would have to relegate itself back to its place, a low place, so that the people could be at peace and enjoy the blessing of the fourth day. Now the government had struck the Incel with confusion, by mala, that they might fight what is not, and what was not their enemy. Now then a woman has struck them to say, my house is trash, that you must be struck to be jealous, that trash might have honour, and yet the worthy have said, strike no person, for the house is not trash, that to strike will be dishonour, and so the men do not have to worship dung, and the women who have been striking, saying, be you jealous of what does not cause jealousy, they should be ignored, for they answer to others and they have been without the rebuke of their leaders, for they are not kings of the people, these women. Now then those men more loyal to the father of the Eskimo, the prince who is an Eskimo, indeed it is good and not offensive that they are more loyal to the father, for then do not sow discord anymore, but the prince is very against discord which causes ruin for the nation, for enjoyment of peace, that the foolish woman should be ignored in her discord sowing, and not be striking men who are not envious, that they should be bullied into jealousy that is not really jealousy, but is the result of being molested with bullying, for is the prince's house trash that it is required? But relent, you good women, for your husband withdraws you, for it is not required, for be not troubled because they have not tithed, for they were not given any warning to tithe, and they did not know where honour should be given, for your husband withdraws you to him, indeed pardons, for the devil is the cause of all of the evil, because of lack of knowledge for all the people, including the wives, and her who was not a wife, who is she, and where has she come from? Now they are not jealous, and they did not know to tithe, or where the angel was, or that he was on Earth, and many things they did not know, and they are men of integrity, and so then they will deliver you safely to your husband, or is it not so? But they are worthy people, and people of integrity, for those with integrity have been given confusion by the government.




Now then why have the people of palaces been called evil by the government? Now then more insensitive is the owner of a store than them, for they keep the wife from her husband, and so is more the villain. Now then the women of our nation do not speak what is to be understood. Now who then sows discord? But more the owner of a store and the government. Now then if the government is a mass pedophile and a chauvinist, though they be a feminist chauvinist, and the owner of a store or some thing of the likeness, an insensitive and cruel thing, yet it has not been the Incel who were insensitive and cruel, for what is even misogyny? But because the government wants attention it does not deserve there has been civil war by terrorists among the people, for they send out their own wave, and it causes civil war and discord, and the angel sends a wave, and it beats back the wicked wave. Now then the meeting place must relegate itself, for it does not require or deserve as much attention, and the people are king, and there is the priorities of the people, for the meeting place cannot dictate religious things, and dictate priorities for the people, for the false Shepard will fall, and the government must be relegated, and the entertainments having nothing but to be ignored, and there will only be what is for entertainment, for the Shepherding will be ignored, for the skirmish cannot resist the wave of the angel, and half the leaders of the world are causing petty wars and yet the whole Earth is in peace, in theory, and the other half of the leaders are with the people, and the skirmish governments are waging petty wars that should be refused, for they are the lies, those who should not be considered noble, for such government leaders are the lies who are not noble.




Now then there are the arrogant who are retarded, and they are not the same as the geniuses, for the geniuses are not arrogant, really.




Now then the whole of the Earth is at peace, and so then should they not refuse the lies who are not really noble? Now to live in a lie of peace is at least more peace than most are accustomed to.




Now the wicked, homicidal jack ass, there is no good in them, for they are drinkers of blood, arrogant, for they are not the righteous jack ass, or them with a just cause, or them of wrath, but they only want to be a jack ass, for they are the insatiable serial killers, the dung that drifts and is wicked, for they are the dung of cancer, and it has much blood. Now worse is the napalm, too extreme to be called anything of words, for it is what is not, and such must be removed, for they must find these things and remove them.




There are them who are the military people in society, for they are not what is called mentally ill, but they are doing that which is deliberately trying to be disturbing, for it is deliberate and not part of society, for it is within the military realm, so that society is not able to deal with it. Now such is called military attacking, and it is with anger at society, for it is the attack upon the nation and its society, that it is soldiers of military attacking society, for they have no interest, no regard, in anything of society, but are become foreign enemies operating. Now not jealous are these, but hating society.




Now then the alternative society is giving rebuke to the scoundrels, for they would not repay good with good, and they hated right as a natural brute beast. Now were they not a type of agnostic? But neither tithe or do business, would they, and the easy things even they hated much, that because of the scoundrels an alternative society was required, for those excellent could be given help.




Now then the wicked coward, the piece of dung, yet he exalted himself as being something he was not, but why will the bad of the people take to the way of criminals, if they are not criminals? But if they are even criminals, will they not take to their own ways of what it is and what is right?




Now there are those who do not know what dung they are, that they are believing themselves to be almost upon the same plain as others when they are in a very low place.




Now then there are even criminals gangs, and they are women, at best, and how much worse is the dung that is wicked, more wicked than them.




Now then the Fremin is even rumoured to make many things that do not belong to disappear.




Now the mass pedophile, the chauvinist, yet he is only against the planet, and then even against God, for he attacks society that it may not be able to accomplish those good things of the Lord. Now he is chauvinist and male feminist chauvinist, and even female chauvinist, and so there is even the dung, that is indeed a bringing together of different soldiers of hell.




Now then the feminist chauvinist, he is a lie, for he is not even honourable for war, for he begins at a low place, not even accepting of women being people, and showing compassion from there, he is beating them down. Now brutal is he, cruel, and disrespectful of them in his ways and with his mouth, and there is even them who bombard the discussion quickly, for they are very advanced at discord between the fair shade and the fair shade, for they degenerate quickly to foolishness, to sow discord, to cease the discussion to stumbling blocks and nonsense, for they bombard the discussion they hate, and quickly, and the feminist chauvinists are quick to do so, and it will be, what was not reality anyway, what was not argument anyway, what no person was, there they might be able to bombard discussion, for where there is politics they are becoming dung and relieving themselves of dung in public places to cause disruption for the conversation, for the lords of such do not have to honour the dung of what is not even children.




Now none has to honour dung, and the disruption is a zealot.




Now how far the chauvinist attack goes, how many people, how many governments, is debatable, and yet it is as an attack upon the planet, and it is seeming to be directed towards North America, but also other places, and yet the angel has considered, it is good that there are the she angels, the pillars of gold, for the fourth day has come and the chauvinists have been enemies, as if to ruin the whole planet in favour of the devil and his slavery for the people who are not slaves, and his misanthropy and hatred of the woman, that he might attack in such a way. Now then the chauvinists when they are zealous, yet they would be vigilantes of the devil, and every chauvinist has been a thing that was even considered misanthropy and rebellion against what is noble. Now they are traitors towards the king, haters of the prince, liking more the devil, it would seem, and they need not, it would seem, consider justice and keeping to what is right.




Now who is the false Benjamin, who is the feminist chauvinist, who is the dung of Benjamin? But soldiers of hell is him.




Now then the men of other nations, yet they are not being a chauvinist in their actions most often, that seek to be honourable, for it is not what is a chauvinist, but it is being honourable, and indeed there are also honourable men among our own people, in Eretz Chadrack and America. Now the discord sowing has been advanced, and indeed past generations of discord sowers have been reckless among the people, pushing things to extremes that are not really there most often, and the discord is seeming to be most among the fair shade and the fair shade, often concerning things of politics but also things of social matters. Who then is the problem, but the chauvinist, the scoundrels, and the dung? But it is seeming that the nation is able to be at peace, for is there really any cause for discord? But then the vast and terrible war of the chauvinist beast that dwells in the hidden realm, that is not being seen, that is concealed much from the people, yet it is a terrible beast and how big it is they might not know and neither can it be determined how large a monster it is. Now it is seeming to be dwelling also, in a type of Ocean, concealed from the people and yet consistent and horrible, for it is a hidden monster than can be studied and noticed, and it only is against the Earth entire, and the advancement, for it opposes almost all that the angel would desire to accomplish, and it hinders much that is good, the horrible beast. Now does not the chauvinist bow in an evil way, for he abandons his place. But he is part of the monster that does not have to be tolerated, for it is only nature that men and women be just in such ways.




Now then the gold is paid to a wife, to a moon, and she gives to Saturn, for she provides for Saturn, and she goes out and gathers and gives to Saturn, for there will not be a moon who is not really a wife of Saturn, that she would be a chauvinist, for Saturn will not permit any who is not a wife. Now then they will go before the wife and not before Saturn, also, in many things, for there will be no moon that is not a wife, for the wives are the Lord's women.




Now Lishich is the female chauvinist who is jealous of herself, more chauvinistic than any woman, for she is chauvinist beyond chauvinist, and she is prostitute of the enemy of the lake of fire.




Now the queen princess of the dawn, she does not need to mind her own business in considering wisdom and yet if she is jealous of herself, it is a different thing, for as far as Lishich is in hell, so the princess of the dawn is in Heaven and more so.




Now who is more wise than the queen princess of the dawn? But what woman is wiser than her? For she gets wisdom of men, she attains more wisdom, and she is the opposite of the woman who is a chauvinist, for her who hates chauvinism, it is a wise thing.




Now Anothoth, even, must retrieve her husband, and not have any of the things of chauvinism.




Now then let the wives of Saturn prepare the house, preparing the Heavens, for they shall have their houses, the seven houses. Now these are seven sects, the seven Temples of the temple, and the people will have the Lord as their God, for He will be the focus of the churches, for they shall not have any mother before the Lord, for what can their mother do for them? But each woman will be Anothoth or queen princess of the dawn, and Anothoth too is a queen and not a woman who is a chauvinist, for all things of chauvinism she is right to abandon, for has not the world rejected the angel as it has rejected millions upon millions?




Now the name of Anothoth is Queen princess of angels.




Now even to seventy two the Muslims have fulfilled, but when they are fighting truly for justice, for how will a despicable fool of discord and foolishness, even wickedness and intentional ignorance towards angels be called a martyr?




Now them who are so retarded, the retardation could not even be human, yet these are as demons, for there is no thing of being mentally challenged that is considered, for mentally challenged is a different thing, and yet there is the dung that is incoherent, for what is spoken, at its level, it is not even the same language, but it is the language of meldok, and of what is ignorance. Now such retarded of a type are the nothing beneath the Earth, for they open their mouths with false premises, with ignorance, and their speech is incoherent, for they are not understood. Now then they are needing to attain the things of the child, and there is them not more man than the women, that they are not ready to be a man yet, that their are in the realm of women in their ways, and women are even right to be killing some of them, for they are not ready yet to be a man that they have passed by the defence of women. Now such is also meldok.




Now these things are primitive and misanthropic, the chauvinist, the psychopath, and the self rebellion. Now they are buried in the Earth, dug up with fossils. Now then rape is primitive, also, and incoherent, for it is not even animals that do such.




Now then should the sister of the sons of Jacob be the wife of a ruler, for a ruler is a type of prince. Now harsh and base words are these that say the wife of the ruler is a prostitute, for the ruler is not a chauvinist, and though the wife of a ruler is different, yet call her a prostitute? Now such is ignorance, and should not have been spoken, for though the ways of Jacob may be different, and they are also the angel's ways, yet the ways of the house of a ruler are another good way, and those women of the house are wise, also.




Now then if the spirits are coming upon any, yet be not an ignorant people who do not know what must be performed, for the Lord is demanding, and it is not difficult. Now then make not any sister of the sons of Jacob as if a chauvinist woman, less the spirits not be pleased, and be angry, and the Lord not easily pardon you. But then be minding your own business as a man, that you not trespass against man or woman, for the ruler, too, can be with her who is the opposite of a chauvinist. Now then is it not so, that if you are showing consideration, if you are minding your own business, that all the spirits of the Earth will be at peace with you? Now then the society is an Ocean, and you reap what you sow, and yet who is able to know it, and what is? But wisdom is required to understand. Now then not all evil that happens is a sign that there has been wrong, but a sign that there has been good in many cases. Now will not a man reap the rewards, and the people will be pleased, and yet the indignant murderer spirits, they will lay in wait, and then when a man has done very well, then they will attack when he has exceeded in doing well. Now they are the Pharisee spirits, for there are spirits for everything. Now there are seasons, and spirits, and times of peace and times of war, and the great will be ejected to more greatness and evil will happen, for it is a thing of weather, of rain and sunlight. Now then have an open hand to the queens, be keeping to what is for you, be considerate of others, that things might go well for you, for those who would even rob, they will be robbed to nothing when they are having to repay seven times to the Lord, for have not the cognitive impairment, for the Lord will take here and there, will he not? Now then if you are doing well, yet the Lord is not a fool, and He cannot be cheated or deceived. Now then be of the better morality, of civilized people, for is it not demanded by the Lord that you be of the civilized morality? Now foolishness is against it, and self rebellion, for the vengeance of a person, their want for vengeance, is making them a natural brute beast when there is not a war against the Earth and the Lord. Now the tables do not often turn, that you not be a natural brute beast, to speak of turning what is not turned, for you turn yourself away from yourself and become a brutal beast. Now then the Lord is the table, and He will give reward for your feast, but you do not desire to gain His favour and to please Him? Now have you turned God by force when He was not ever turned for you to begin with, except in your pointless imaginings that others cannot have? But a person must go to the Lord, and the slave goes to its god, and the servant, its king, and yet the Earth is better when people are seeking the Lord. Now favour more the judgments and opinions of the sociopaths, that you prefer the clouds to be your Lord? But the clouds are not made for it, and it is a naive thing. Now the clouds shepherd with the opposite, that people might be against a thing, and so how will you be calling them Lord? But then listen to your mother, to reject your mother in a fashion, to have God as your Lord, for He is able to do things for you, and He has power, and your mother, too, is provided for by Him. Now then if any turns the tables by their pointless and empty mouth, yet others cannot share in their pointless imaginings, for even the small child cannot be deceived, and a sick person are they who throw a tantrum because of it, for they trespass and have no right to demand that others be deceived, for are they then a primitive thing, and a natural brute beast? But the vengeful scoundrels are robbing with all their strong arm and might, with all the might they are able to be strong with, that their strength is only in robbing, and in good things they are very weak, that they are deserving to be robbed seven times for the wickedness of them.




Now them not honouring a king, giving no respect to anything that deserves respect, they are also robbing and are right to be robbed seven times.




Now them who does not trespass, who minds their own business, they do not steal, and them who tithes, they do not rob, and them who does not unjustly kill, they do not rob.




Now them who marries the wife of another, yet they rob, for they are as dishonourable soldiers who have ruined a land for the cause of wickedness, because they have hated good, and they have captured women and kept them from their own people. Now him who does this has a strange configuration, for he is confused, and the daughter of him desires the understanding of John the Baptist, and the wife of him, that her husband believe her not captured, for he is not the husband, and he is confused and has come to robbery of himself by the Lord, of having kept himself by the Lord of the understanding and wisdom of John the Baptist, for very great was John the Baptist, very intelligent and great in understanding. Now the man who marries the wife of another, he is as brother to the scoundrel, and yet though he will tithe, and the scoundrel will not tithe, yet he knows that the woman is not his wife, and that there is not true love. Now then if he says, I knew it not, yet he knew, and him who ruins the Lord's land intentionally, or exploits such things, yet he is as a demon, and a wicked scoundrel, a piece of dung.




Now there is not really adultery, for no person really does such a thing, for the criminals of hell, yet they do not do such, for their crimes were otherwise, and it would be a pedophile of hell if any really committed adultery, for adultery is not a real problem, except in theory, among the people, and yet it is possible it has occurred. Now it is as a woman breaking her own heart, as a woman who mutilates her own self because of the heart break of something, and yet if her husband lives, why then would she do such a thing, but if she is the wife, yet she is breaking her own heart, mutilating herself, and what woman has done such? Now a knife covered in dung is the man who rails blasphemy against the woman, who goes around grabbing at the genitals, an unwell and wicked man, abject and wretched, for the wife of the man, her name even, is the genitals of a man of great combat ability, a man of great intelligence, even a man of great beauty, and yet the pretty boy is a kiss from a child to the man, the sight of an angel.




Now there is much that does not really occur, by the truth of God, that they have not understood because of the lesser enlightenment.




Now then will the angel even be Ulysses in some things? But he is expecting it will be so in some things.




Now rampant was the robbing of things and God, that the men were robbed seven times more than what they had robbed, and so there the Lord was nihilism, for in Him, there the wisdom and the nihilism was found, that other believed but with misunderstanding in nihilism, that it was only the cognitive impairment, and so the men had been robbed by God and it was rampant, that many who had robbed had been robbed seven times, and there were scoundrels in the land, and they had even turned the tables by rebelling against themselves, that the tables had not turned actually, and many had come by the wrong road, and so the angel considered, ignore the scoundrels, hear not their ignorant speeches, for they are as teachers who do not know anything, for they are Esua without reason, and so let men take their portions of God, and those who are sabotaging, they must be ignored, for they seek to rob without reason, without cause, for they refuse all good and they will not commit to anything of the Lord, even as the atheist might commit to what is good, to integrity of atheism, and so these are fit to be ejected, those who sabotage, for the chain the field is more right for them who do such things and without reason, for there cannot be a reason, or else it is not injustice.




Now all those who are robbing consistently, are they not called meldok, that they should be removed? But let the soldiers of cities consider such more, that society is pursuing what it has set out to accomplish, for the angel is supporter, and much of the priests of wellness doing what they are given to do, and doing it as it is wanted to be accomplished, for it is the good of society, and yet those who blaspheme it, who commit abomination, are not these the priests of wellness who are despising their own task and the priesthood of them? But then let there be no more wicked foolishness, but let there be no more added, for there is no excuse for wickedness.










Princess, lost in the haze, the girl of different days beyond,

and something to desire, beyond the fallen empire, holding out to last the season, through the dark, the spark will just know,

of the fire that shone all season, in the sky, without their treason,

she is shining brand new, and this time, it goes along,

princess of the dawn, queen princess of the light that breaks beyond,

there's a star for you, as you carry us all through, and I'll go along,







Don't even tell me, that I could do better,

I'm already not worthy at all,

Don't even give me, any love letter,

I'm already beginning to fall,

Don't even tell me, the war will be over,

there's no reason I can see,

Don't even tell me, that I can now save you,

unless you first save me,

queen princess of the dawn,

na na, na na, na na,

carry me along,

na na, na na, na na,

until the worst is gone,




All beauty, and fire of war, that took the ships down,

lost cause of drifting sands, some people understand,

there is a shadow growing, and light rising with the morning,

something was right there for me, sometimes I fall too far away,

I bet that you could just save me, morning star seems to feel alright,

I guess that you could just find me, when I need a little light,




Come on,

again,

I will,

pretend,

I will,

be fine,

but I needed a saviour,




Come on,

again,

I will,

be here,

behind,

the times,

beyond,

their fear,




Now is not the chauvinist the servant to the king, or servant to the prince, and yet without knowing what to do, for there is a river without a bridge placed there by vain lies, and so there is only honour for the loyal to the prince or king to see the house being formed when the wife comes to the husband, that he begins to meddle, and it is the stumbling block of the river that he harasses and seems to cause problems, when he does not really, for he desires to cross the river. Now then he cannot receive his blessing, and all his rewards because of the missing bridges, and so then the woman will be able to say, if you are then contentious to cross the river, peace be upon you, and blessing of the kingdom that is great. Now they will not be chauvinist anymore, but they will be free, and they will be with Jacob, even with the priesthood of the descendants of Japeth. Now so they will receive their blessing, and they will be great, and the kings who are true kings, they will rise up, and their rulers of their kingdoms, they will be great with them, for feudalism is the advancement, and so let the priesthood know that the angel already has his own house, and it takes priority always, for his immediate house always takes priority, and kings, even great kings are the right hand men of that house, for the least in the house of the angel is a great king among the people. Now when has the priesthood given gold, or when have they offered aid, or when have they been doing works for him? But the immediate house of the angel, it is taking priority, for it is called Atreidis, Corrino, Harkonnen, and the house of the Emporer, for all these houses are the angel's house.




Now though the chauvinist will be freed by loyalty when he tries to cross the bridge, that he becomes free after he has been a contention to the wife he sees quickly, for his heart leads him quickly, and he harasses her, for he will be freed and blessed, for he has been robbed prior, and yet he will be placed back upon the golden tree, from where he came. Now it is so with men, for they are men who have been robbed, and they will be as soldiers who have honour, wise and great men of kindness, for the wife is seen quickly, and yet the man who is a devil, who is infested with demons who are soldiers of hell, who is a natural brute beast, a greatly rebellious and horribly wicked thing, he is worse than a slave, and he is also a chauvinist, but a brutal chauvinist, and he hides himself, and he acts as if good at most times, or acts as if some other thing, and yet he is still dung, and he cannot be blessed by the wife, but the wife need not fear him, and she is ever right, though it is against the soldiers of cities, for her to kill such a demon and a devil, for these are not men who have been robbed, but they are men who intentionally rob in rebellion to God and to society, natural brute beasts, having taken the number of the beast, brutal and horrible devils, also chauvinists and yet not the same as others. Now they are slaves, and even soldiers of hell, and the woman is right to kill them.




Now then every woman who is not a chauvinist, she will be armed in the reign of the angel.




Now where there is what should have been killed by the woman, the blame is more towards the woman who did not kill.




Now the woman not a chauvinist, she is even right to be flushing the very chauvinistic woman sometimes.




Now incoherent are the chauvinists, and even if they were the majority, which they cannot be, unless the Earth is hell, they would still be incoherent to truth.




Now them who uses mentalism moves the standard away from morality, for the more moral are called guilty by it.




Now fertilizer by itself is not profane, but profanity is a type of evil blasphemy.




Now a chauvinist is profane with his mouth and actions, and by his zeal he profanes the Sabbath.




Now the religious chauvinist is zealous against the blessing be given, but them who are leaders who welcome it, are as kings also receiving.




Now to hate what is good things when it is hatred of women, it is great wickedness found with it. Now thus are stones beneath the Earth.




Now them who love their traditions more than religion, they are as evil demons that cause a pit. Now then the traditions never were great, either, and those who believe them the norm are believing in a lie.




Now great care has the queens for their people, for they are princess queens, things of wonder and pure light, and wisdom and understanding is with them. Now they learn things of men, they are able to speak all their husband's understanding concerning themselves, for they have wisdom of the Christ, and yet it is little by little, and evidence.




Now the jack ass woman, brutish, she believes it is offence to be intelligent, even offence worthy of action, but a child is already well in keeping the things of Moses.




Now then nothing yet has been as advanced as Bethlehem, and yet there is that which is a poison vapour cloud, and it does not even kill, but it is people, and there is that which is napalm cloud, and that which is frigid waters, a flood, that the people must climb, and all these things are incoherent, for their words are incoherent, and it is all false premise. Now why will you contend with devil worshippers if you do not have to? But they cannot hear you, and thus they are insolent, and they are incoherent, for they dwell below Earth and reality is on land, for they are incoherent to truth, to reality, for lies and ignorance is the devil's kingdom.




Now there is a retarded who is as a flapping bird that cannot fly, and he does what is pointless and calls it of value and substance, for it is only impulse and being theatrical.




Now there is the flightless flapping that also relieves itself of dung in public, to disturb the conversation.




Now communism is the chicken, and another nation the sea lion, and another nation the lion, and Eretz Chadrack is a fast moving river.




Now them who count intelligence and nobility to be offence, that they have a right to be angry, a child is better and with more understanding than them.




Now them who are insolent, yet do they not deserve the rebuke?




Now there is the thing of dung being a man, that it acts the things of men as if having cause, when dung has not the cause of men.




Now if demons and devils are hating themselves because of their hatred of God, are they not more foolish than the devil? But if they are as mass killers who would take as many as they can, and even taking mostly the better people before they commit suicide, indeed they are devils and demons, and there is no other explanation.




Now then, what queen princess of the dawn will lead the donkey that carries the king? But because it carries the king, yet it must be a queen princess of the dawn. Now as of yet these things are not performed.




Now non Hebrew Jews, Zion Jews, and the Hebrew Jews, they are real Jews, but the false Jews are profaning the things of the Lord, that they are Jews by profaning, Jews who blaspheme and profane the things of the Lord, and let them be ignored, for they perform religion of keeping out Jacob, and the good, and they blaspheme and speak ignorance as if the people are with them. Now they are chauvinists of religion as well, and of all things they are chauvinist, and they are against the things of the Lord.




Now then a false Jew has been a rugged range of small hills upon the land, and yet they are volcanic hills, rugged and simmering with the fire of hell, and not calm are they really, for they are speaking decency against the Lord even, and they turn right concepts for evil, to exercise good things for evil.




Now the stones are good, and there are stones of the philistines even, and there are many stones of Zion.




Now they bully with false discord, and dismantle enlightenment of the nation, for the false reports make them who speak truth ashamed, and yet they are only a jack ass, and a base fool who are opposing wisdom and understanding. Now then they are insolent when they reference the bullying of false discord against those who would use understanding, and truth is in the Universe, that no person need be ashamed of it.




Now then the false flags of them who bully a nation with skirmishes of reports, and the attempts to bully and to Shepherd the people away from enlightenment, they are insolent, the work of dung.




Now let not foreign nations Shepherd the nation that is great, for they attack with their people who are among you. Now there are them not loyal to your people, for their own people they hate, as those who call for ruin of the nation as the answer.




Now the spirit of the false Jew, let it pass away, for it is a foreign enemy among your own people, and them who have the spirit of it are not believing that there is their own people. Now the spirit profanes the truth, for it is often superficial, lacking substance. Now they are a false Jew of the enemy.




Now by the clouds the poor nation Shepherds the great and bullies it and makes it into chaos.




Now them kept out, they must find the like people, for though opposites may attract, yet they do not attract in everything, and yet the false Jew is a scattering of evil among a nation.




Now why is a king considered a danger? But because he speaks of what is having concern for the people, and because he speaks of things of strategy of others? But he is not a danger to the people.




Now him who is upon a horse, yet he pleases the chauvinist woman as well, and yet can the chauvinist woman be trusted, if she is very much a chauvinist? Now without reason there is the woman who hustles for nothing, as her who seeks out clouds that bring no rain, for there is her who wastes the time of people and without reason, for she is a calamity in such, a thing of being sorry for others. Now then if she has been neglected, and so she is a chauvinist, then the Lord will not neglect her, will He? Now better even to be taken by the Lord than by a parent in some ways. Now then him upon a donkey, yet it is a thing that is not for the chauvinist woman.




Now then if the slave hates women that he is a devil, a horrible demon that is fit for the quarry, and not the field, who will be surprised at such?




Now what is offensive to the wife is offensive to the husband. Now as for petty matters that must be let go, yet it is another matter. Now queen princess of the dawn, she is fulfilling the things of the Christ, and what woman is wiser than her?




Now there are men as prophets who are wise among the people.




Now anger not the spirits with your wrong that it does not go well for you, and yet the Lord is God.




Now the spirits do not say what the wrong has been.




Now peace to the soldiers of cities, for there are them doing the work of angels.




Now wise are many of the soldiers of cities, and let them be part of Saturn in the way that is right for them.




Now then a portion of the soldiers of cities, even, are right to be angels of Saturn, and they are wise. Now them who goes with the Christ, they too are wise.




Now the Christ is in all good things, of all kingdoms.




Now the profane, false Jews, were they not too scoundrels? But the slaves had no reason for offence to begin with, and they had no reason for anger to begin with, and they were only waiting to be enslaved, and yet the Emperor has a great house and there are the great houses of feudalism in Eretz Chadrack. Now there is her who might know, the servant, the chauvinist, they are only retarded and enemy to the husband, and it is not right to respect them, for they are not men, but they are not really servants, for servants would be seeking some good in trying to cross the river, to become great themselves, but they are slaves, demons and devils, and they are not men, and it is not permissible to be respecting them. Now then what compassion can there be for the despicable slaves of the quarry or the field? Now then the wives of the great houses, yet they are queens of the great houses. Now then she shall be respected in her good and her integrity, for she is a queen among them. Now the daughter of integrity not attained to such, but having a want for it, that she believes it good, she too is with the great houses, for she is a princess of the house. Now she will be with her right house, for is she lost that she has not known where to go? But has the world then rejected her? But Dagon is gathering up his house, the women of integrity even, if they will seize him, for they gather him and he does not gather them, and all have the Lord, for the men are having the Lord as their father, that they are great because of it, and these are some as if greater than Dagon in some ways, greater than their mother, for they have the Lord. Now such is of Dagon's house, that they are those who are stating they are part of the house. Now the scoundrels have become almost as slaves, and not even servants, and they exploited the ignorance, for they owed the Lord nothing, and they owed Dagon nothing, and they did not fulfill what was right for them concerning such things, for there are not many who are really rich that they can tithe the full tithe of Moses and be right with it in their heart, for it is better they tithe what is right for them that they know what is good for them. Now the wife will not respect the scoundrel who has refused to tithe, or to give honour where honour is right and due, for the scoundrel is as a slave, and a despicable thing, and they have exploited the ignorance concerning what was only standard, for the people to be attaining greatness.




Now that which is psychopaths who are insane, who are retarded, who are abject, who are insatiable to do wickedness, who are serial killers, who form groups of sociopaths and every abject thing to do wickedness upon the land, to desecrate as sycophants, who are demons upon the Earth, against all good things of the Lord, these are the priority, or they should be, for the soldiers.




Now if there is a gang that is only demons and devils, and it has men and women in its gang, those who are evil, who are proven to be evil and very wicked, that they are taken into the gang by being proven to be abject and wicked, than for what reason do they blend it with religion, or anything that is good? But the devils know, and are aware of what of what is wicked.




Now no longer can David and Cessus be divided from the citizens who are trust worthy and good, for there is a war for peace and for the planet, for the survival of the species.




Now them who sows discord, who separates the citizens from David and Cessus, they are doing what is not just concerning the people.




Now there is no war really between conservative and liberal.




Now then what type of atheist is it, but some agnostic type, that is not called atheist, that is pushing the man away with a run and shove? But would she not be better off with Edom, or will she find her mate in the forest? For she is a ferral girl, and she has been raised to be animal, to be ferral, for she is not able to be a woman, and so shall the the Heavens disappear? But the standard does not change, for it is nature, and no standard can ever change, for it is nature, for they cannot move the standard one increment, not a little, for it is there by nature, and hard are the standards there, that it is nature and that there is the ferral girl, whether intelligent or not, she has not wisdom, and the ferral things, and will they find their mate in the forest? But better for them to be with a person no matter what happens, rather than to be with its mate, for they are able to be human and there is what is better, wisdom, better than intelligence or much intelligence with an animal, for wisdom is better than intelligence, and it compliments intelligence. Now who has made her ferral? But did they not hate her? Now she comes from the training of Esua, of the land of Edom, and she comes from the brutal foolishness of Esua, from his false religions that makes her ferral. Now then excise Esua from the people, for they are also the false Jews, the brute things of superficial that has not substance, and the chauvinists, also, being trained in the superficial and what lacks substance and truth, to be making them successful ferrel people, lacking wisdom, brutal and difficult. Now then Esua's people are seeming to be as a type of atheist, and yet they are not atheists, or not all of them are atheists, and among them also is the false Jews who are chauvinists, who speak as if for the people, as if a hedge of soldiers and a skirmish, for they are a skirmish. Now they are scoundrels, and the ferrel woman, even, is taught in the ways of scoundrels to be without wisdom. Now then where they speak of pushing away the husband or pushing away the wife, yet they are speaking of problems of Edom, of Esua, that they should not even be found among those of Jacob.




Now brutal has the society been to be indulging the people of Esua with them, and Esua being the elder brother, yet he is slave to Jacob, for the Lord has made it so, that in truth he is slave to Jacob, for he has no substance to his elder claim, even though he is the elder, for he has no inheritance, no substance, for the substance is with Jacob, and Esua is a slave to Jacob, slave to the truth, for Esua is rightly cast down when he is being superficial and claiming the land, even a small portion of the land. Now he is intelligent people? But actually those of Jacob or more intelligent, and far more. Now Benjamin is not with Esua, and nor is Solomom, and nor is the Christ.




Now the slave is incoherent in everything, and yet they are able to receive commands, for they can understand the language to the degree that they can receive commands. Now such is Esua.




Now those who obtain credentials, yet they must put the Lord first, put being human first, put wisdom first, that they not eat and take into themselves the superficial, that they not become ferrel, going backwards, that they not put on the armour of the superficial, of Esua, for where they gain credentials, they fall in greatness in the kingdom of the Lord, and yet they are willing to take the lesser place, the lesser things and continue to be human, for what is greater by Esua, is lesser in truth, for the Lord is truth, the Christ is the truth, for they maketh themselves lesser and yet they are willing and so by mantaining humanity, keeping with the Lord, they are sons to go down from the place to take employment, rich man's children who go down into the town to take employment, making themselves lesser, and yet they are willing, and because of money and other things, and so it is what it is, and those who have not gone down, who are able to mantain greatness, yet it is what it is, for Esua rages, for he believes Jacob has stolen his inheritance, and yet Esua has robbed himself, for at least if you take employment, do not take the armour of Esua, do not eat of the superficial, that you become a ferral animal in many ways, that when you have become incoherent totally with what is ignorance, you not be only fit for being a slave. Now then do not bully, to sow discord, those who taketh the lesser place in the kingdom, for some things are a more a lesser place, for them who bully, yet they bully as a slave in their mouth if people are at peace, for none was jealous, none with envy, not with having any problem, and the people were content and there was no shame among them, for there is no discord, and the kingdom is at peace, and everything was content and well. Now it has never been so important, of such consequence and requirement that you bring slavery in the right way, and not in the foolish and wrong way as prior when they were blind to many things, for let Nephtali put their hand first to grab the chain, to place the chain to the slave, for their hand will be first in the thing, and later the fair shade, that before their was foolishness and ignorance, and yet blameless they are able to cast the first stone, for they have never been slave owners, for the slaves have gathered without anything to do, without work, and they make themselves a wicked plague among the people, for they are waiting to be put to work and they had no reason to begin with, and they have no will to rage or to agree, that they rage, for they do not know when to rage and when not to, for they make themselves slaves even by self rebellion, for they are anger where they believe perhaps a man would be angry, for they have no reason.




Now then if slaves show up, do they not want work? Now they are committing terrorism temporarily before the sling stone is used and the chain, but it is not right for David to be killing them. Now then happy is the Emperor to pardon such, and he will still give sheeps and goats when he can, to invite them for meal and drink, even though they have killed many of his slaves, perhaps, for the Emperor is saying, yet it is nothing, but still the greater things David will no doubt perform, for he is not a scoundrel, and yet still it is the Lord who is still doing what He wishes to do, for he brings slaves, and yet if David has been overzeolous, yet it is pardoned by the Emperor, and he will be grateful still, and yet in the future it should not be so, for the slaves arrive and must be chained and they will do work, for none of them has carried out that which is to kill. Now then what wrong have you committed, David, but being overzeolous to kill the slaves instead of subdueing them and using a chain? But it is nothing, and it is no grudge, and so then you are loyal, and loyal to the Emperor and there will be time for wealth, for already the Lord is providing, and so then only keep away that which would be a devil, to profane the Sabbath, to sabotage wealth, for the demons are doing it, and indeed if slaves are showing up then it is not a matter of wrong that you are removing their wealth and tithing half of the portion to the Emperor, for they plague my land, and two of ten of wealth you will keep, and eight of ten you may tithe to the Emperor, for Eretz Chadrack is my land, and the people are civilized. Now then what requires a chain, yet it is not wrong, and so there is what is not really forbidden for it falls within the realm of what is to be killed that you not scatter the people but forbidding the Lord. Now if the Lord brings slaves, then indeed they should be subdued, for they are not a fighting force of enemies. But they are easily subdued and a chain may be for them. Now then the killing of slaves has been nothing, for it is good, and still loyal, and yet there is the greater thing of substance, so then bring me what will be riches for my house, that my house be first provided for, for it is only right. Now then if Damascus has robbed the Emperor, yet it is not robbery, for it is nothing, and there is not grudge, and the army is man, and the Emperor is king, and so then there is nothing wrong for a man. Now then loyalty has still be shown to the Emperor, and yet rob the Emperor not anymore, for the room for error is almost expended, for all men are men by God, for God provides manhood for men, that his manhood must be reliant upon his righteousness and what is required by the Lord, for the standard of God cannot change, for God is nature for the people, and the standard cannot change, and morality is all nature for the people, and any religion that is not nature, it is not true. So then they will call it wisdom who are atheists, if they are to call it something. Now then the people are civilized and for fulfilling, for those who are not for fulfilling and being men, they are not the people, but they are those who are robbed by the Lord, who are becoming slaves and have become slaves, for they are greatly in the debt of the people, the Lord, and the angel, for there are those quickly becoming slaves by being scoundrels, who the wives of men are not permitted to respect or regard as men, and those who are receiving great blessing from the Lord, and so the people are civilized and the slaves, a portion of them, is being killed, and yet for a debt is increased, and it is as credit, for it is nothing, for a man has credit, and a great man more credit, for there is nothing yet and nothing to mention, and indeed it is good, for a man is a man.




Now then the people are robbed by God for their robbery until they are slaves, and them very a slave is entirely incoherent. Now then it is not permissible for a slave to be as if married to a person, for there is no marriage with a slave and a person.




Now a man cannot have manhood to speak unless it is because of Him who grants manhood, and if he is robbed by God of manhood, yet the Lord is just.




Now if one man will watch a nation descend to slaves before Him, if he is the only man, yet it is not the man, but it is the Lord.




Now if there are women who are overcontrolling of themselves in a way that is not in obedience to God, but is as if overrighteous, having integrity that is evil, yet is it not the case they are not with their husband that it is so?




Now then why stoop or stumble if anything is incoherent? Now also psychology is not for dealing with anything, and what they call insanity, it is only meldok, for nothing else is mental illness that is considered to be insanity, for only meldok is considered insanity and only those who are meldok are those who should be killed if any is to ever be killed. Now there is no other thing that is mental illness, for there is mental illness, meldok, and there is retardation, and every other thing is not anti social, and is not for society to mention or to know, for only the priests of wellness can know other things.




Now whether a hypocrite or not, when they open their mouth with the Christ, to speak truth, for He is the truth, yet it is still true where it is true to be speaking the Christ. Now yet who can open his mouth with hypocracy to speak of the Lord, from the Lord, for the Lord is Him who is granting the manhood of the man, that him who speaks with his opening of his mouth from God, in anything, yet it comes from the manhood that is of God. Now then what is not of being a man then is not of God, and there is a just recompense, a robbing for robbing, an evil for wickedness, a unich for fickle girl, evil faggotry, and there is a just recompense for everything, for what not a man has no reason, for only God has reason, only a man has reason in his being a man, that men are having to be saved, for they are from the Earth, for they are after the fall of Adam, and they come to the Lord, for it is nature, for to be a man in also all the religion in a way, that all true religion is nature, and what is only right, that them who would deceive religion, they would deceive themselves, deceiving their own manhood? Now they cut off their own finger, and two fingers, and for what purpose? Now make yourself hideous and then think you are not odious? But who has mutilated themselves so greatly with their own wickedness that they are an odious thing among the people? But it is the slave who has mutilated themselves, and limits the Lord has taken and sense of decency the Lord has removed, and it is the sign of a slave, and the sign of a unich is evil faggotry. Now is it easier for some to say they cut off their own member, or that they commit evil and the Lord cuts? But it is the Lord who cuts, who cuts off the fingers, who cuts off the member, and yet the Lord too is able to heal, and yet He cannot be deceived, not in the eyes of justice of men or in the eyes of God, that you not be a foolish beyond nature, to be dung. Now her who opens her mouth with Dagon, for the angel is a spirit as well that is also upon the Earth in places, yet she is not doing evil, and yet be not unaware that there are false spirits, not really angels.




Now then if you are mutilating yourself with wickedness, being justly robbed by the Lord, being mutilated by God, for it is God, then when will you seek your reward from God? But the standard of the Lord is more integrity than dung, and dung does not change the standard of the Lord. Now then only there is the Sabbath that you keep, that you not become profane, for the over diligent, yet though they do not profane the Sabbath, yet they lose from them much that they have gained, for it flies away because they did not keep the Sabbath to be over diligent, even though they have not profaned the Sabbath.




Now them who will not allow people to mind their own business, that they molest, wanting people to be jealous, or to look onto the oxen and work of others, yet these are very wicked people, for they do the work of the devil. Now also they profane and are very wicked, and they go against nature, for they are doing brutality of slaves, for they are stones of Esua, below the Earth.




Now them who bullies, that they want others to be jealous, they are the jealous, and it is known, and they are profane, and they are not grateful, for they go the wrong road, the opposite road, and they must go a long way back, for they have not been born yet, and so a sperm is better than them.




Now them who would be brutal to the child of a person, better a pedophile who is to be killed soon.




Now then what is not a pedophile is known by you who hate the natural brute beast, for be not so in anything, for if they are making you such, yet it is guilt for them and not for you, and yet what is not really a pedophile, you know it by not being a natural brute beast, and also with not being over righteous.




Now the over righteous women, they nudge away the man, push him away, when it is not right to be pushing him away, for they are a little ferrel, but not much, and they are not really with their husband, for better for them to be in the land of Jacob, to love the Lord, rather to have only herbs and good water. Now then find your husband, for be in the land of Jacob, for be not a little ferrel anymore, but there is a time when it is right to push away, to throw punches, and a time when it is not good, for there is more wisdom with Jacob, and Esua is robbed and becomes a slave, and already Esua is a slave.




Now then it is the time, the angel declares, for Esua to be enslaved, for they have committed foolish slavery, and it is the time for Esua to be then found and a chain placed upon him, and so men and women of Esua, turn back if there is still time.




Now Esua will be enslaved, and yet those repenting quickly, let them repent quickly.




Now the land will be light and truth, as it already was, for light is substance and ignorance is superficial.




Now then with light the people will become great, and the useless Shepherds, they are deserving to be forced away, for they keep the land disabled and worse than it could be.




Now there are those of meldok who feed off the dung of people, for their ear hears, they are perceptive much, and they absorb all the dung that a person has ejected from them, for they are the dung of people and they swell. Now then when the dung has been ejected and the dung is full and raging that it reeks horribly and is even dangerous, then it should be buried. Now such are the actions of a civilized people.




Now then what they think is a devil is really only a large canine that is insane as a dog that bites and is having to be put down. Now it is perverse as a wicked and perversely friendly kid, only disturbing, and at another time, very wicked and believed to be a devil.




Now there are canines of Esua, canines of Jacob, and the canines of different people, and the lions of different continents.




Now some transition to all the judgments of the devil, and all his names for the things in his kingdom, according to his religions, and yet his judgments do not have truth and are not for the surface, for land, for they transition to all his names for things, that the names are an abomination and they are not in truth. Now the Lord is owner of the Universe.




Now everything that is real is real.




Now if they are Esua, everything that is real is real, for they must stay far away from Jacob, or they will be worse than dung. Now the king of the Esua, he is the slave of the Jacob, even the lowly Jacob. Now let her be stripped of Esua, that she might be a beautiful Bethlehem.




Now better to call the priesthood of the descendants of Japeth, Aron, that their name will be Aron.




Now if all the words of a person are ignorance, what is not, delusions of grandeur, than they are incoherent, for why will you expect an animal to speak of things that are not incoherent to people. But the language of delusions of grandeur, it is all ignorance and foolishness, false psychology, wickedness, and it spews out the devil's language and wickedness. Now there are even those who cheer for everything the devil does.




Now then the devil's people who cheer for the devil, who rejoice at what he does, yet they are the devil's people.




Now then those in the river to become slaves, yet they fail at each level of obediance to the Lord, that they become slaves. Now then the devil saves some and makes them into something worse, and those who fail at each level of obediance to God, they become slaves, and a man does not decide what obedience to God is. Now him who is a man, deciding what obediance is, against the Lord, is it not a chauvinist? Now then those who obey at each level, will not the Lord reward him? But then robbed seven times for every increment, and robbed quickly at times, are those who would be against the Lord. Now then be not violent to the wife of your youth by any profaness, for consideration is not violent to her, and yet is it not difficult? Now then if there are Jews of integrity, by integrity, yet are there not Jews who are of profaness? Now then is it not known that the slaves of a man sometimes come to him, and cause mayhem, and the soldiers will come and take their portion, and not kill the cattle of the man? Now will the soldiers not then chain the slaves for the man, that they might be killed or put to work? But such are the unruly terrorists, and Damascus robs, for it is not as advanced, for think Damascus is a scoundrel to the angel? Yet a man has credit, and what does David owe me? Now every man has credit, and it is only justice. Now then Damascus has killed its own portion as well, and yet Damascus must be David.




Now then those who judge where there is nothing, it is called wickedness, and a wicked person, whether they are proud or not, for they judge heavy with nothing, and there are serial killer cults, and the opinions of them do not matter.




Now there are those who profane to go more to what is good, for they do not really profane.




Now then if you profane in good ways, yet do not profane the Sabbath, to profane sacred things.




Now there is that which is a disease, which has no human judgment in it, that is only feeling and disease, and frigid misanthropy and anger. Now it is nothing, by wisdom.




Now then robbed seven times many times is him who fights war as war towards a person's marriage, for they have been robbed very many times and seven times many times, and they have nothing, for as their mouth has the right, so they will have the right to their mouth, for in some things it will be that a person will soon have a right to their mouth, for there is the Lord. Now it has already been. Now then they might say the Lord's people do not owe them anything that they have been robbed, and yet can such be said of the angel, for does the angel owe them anything if they have been robbed? Now then the angel is god of the philistines, and so then if the angel owes them anything, so they will have a thing to be adopted, and they will surrender what they have, the fire of them, and the life of them and it will be offered up to the angel.




Now then there will be where Beelzebub will have to pay the dept that his slaves cannot pay, for it will be demanded of him, that the angel will demand it. Now so Beelzebub will give up what he has, and the angel will inherit even that which was given to Beelzebub. Now then if the angel is inheriting even the kingdoms of the devil, they will be converted to life, for the slaves that Beelzebub has made for himself, they will be the slaves of the angel's slaves.




Now then if the angel abandons Eretz Chadrack, the people may eat each other's flesh, and yet there are those who are the Lord's and nothing can be taken from them.




Now a man will not decide what obedience to God is, and nor will he decide he is man when the Lord has not agreed.




Now better to say, the Lord is my father, for you are commanded strongly and with consequence for disobedience, to be obeying the Lord, to be doing His work, that if Esua is harrassing you, forcing you to not obey the Lord, even in the blink of your eye, that the Lord is commanded you in, then a sperm is better than Esua, and many of them have taken the number of the beast. Now abominations of such have never been on Earth, and indeed, such are slave of the devil, and so then in righteousness judge which slaves should go to who, and David is able to spare the larger portion, but a man has credit, that you not be a wicked person, for he takes his portion, and you have the greater portion, and he will judge by righteousness which slaves are whose and who they should go to, and you may kill any without guilt.




Now then the Emperor is only trying to put the head back on the penis, for though you say, why should any have to tithe, yet do not resist, for the penis should have the head that you do not struggle so much and rebel, for the angel really does understand what women like better, and you are well to listen. Now as for foreskin, either is fine, whether foreskin or not.







Now the man is not required, you Jews, to wear the armour of integrity, to wear the jock strap armour that protects the hostile grab at the genitals, for though you teach good things, some of you Jews, yet a civilized people does not have to wear armour while they are in society, for it is offensive to have to wear armour. Now then as for you soldiers, do they not choose to be soldiers?




Now why is your society, why are people grabbing at people's genitals so much, as wicked cowards, worthy to be killed some of them, and others worthy to have their hand removed? Now will any cut out the tongue? But the Lord is able to rob you. Now the Lord is giving always the just recompense, that you not be a foolish and blind people, for you do not have to see it, like a child would have to see it, for what type of brutal people are having to see it? But the devil saves them and makes them something worse, and the Lord saves the Lord's people, and makes them something better. Now so is battle. Now cursed are the devil's people, defeating themselves with their war, and being defeated by the light that defeats, for foolishness is their actions, that they are losing and losing and becoming slaves, for are in the river that will make them slaves.




Now then a man or woman of the lake of fire, yet they are not really people, and her who judges by nihilism, she is with the animals, for you are not able to be deceived by it. Now then people help people, for they do not be pleased in nihilism. Now they do not stand back, they do are not fooled by the ignorance of the devil's dictating what is not really reality, for they are not deceived by animal nihilism, for people help people. Now they will say to a female, you do not have the right to an opinion because you are not a woman for you speak as if the opinion of a woman, for an animal is not a woman, now to a prostitute, you do not have the right to say, for you are a prostitute. Now then the animal who say, you are not even pretty to the pretty boy, yet she is not a woman, for a woman cannot deny it, and she will curse him with other things, yet she may have less hearing, for Absalom is the angel's shin. Now then pretty boy, she is not married if she is loving you, unless she is something worse than an animal. For are you not the soldier of such, the mighty of such? Now then it is Adonijeh who is soldier of city, and yet you are soldier of another thing, for the family of Adonijeh, it is all soldiers of something that are soldiers not of war.




Now then do not injustice to the woman whose husband is a great scoundrel and slave, for she has been divorced by his wicked that he would not obey the Lord on every level, and so her husband is not, and she has not husband, for she has right cause against you if you do not have understanding in such? Now then if you do not want her, yet such is not the matter, for she cannot be condemned as an adulterer, and such is the matter.




Now the man who keep having more cut off his penis, yet eventually he is not even married anymore, and yet the angel fights to put the head back on the penis of men, and yet the men are stubborn and fight, and they are stubborn men. Now believe the angel does not have the wisdom to know that women are liking the head on the penis and not liking that the penis should be cut off?




Now the men are sometimes saying, yet we do not have to listen to you, yet we do not have to obey God, for the angel is trying much to put the head on the penis.




Now then if a man obeys God, yet there are some great that their penis becomes very large, and yet it must be small to become large, for stretch not the penis that it be impotent.




Now the agnostic is considered a different religion and yet if they claim the nation with their mouths, they blaspheme, and if they are a jack ass, yet will it be with heart only? For if the heart of the agnostic guides them, indeed if they blaspheme because of their heart only, if they are a jack ass because of their heart, yet they are not able to claim the nation, for the nation does not belong to them, for if they have delusions of grandeur, if their religion is things that belong to others, if it is made up of all things, of eating and drinking all things, as a Christian, yet they are not permitted to claim the nation, for so long as they do not claim the nation, so long as they refrain from terrorism, for they can have no reason for it, they cannot have delusions of grandeur. Now then if they refuse all religion, and yet they do the things of Christians, and if their religion is their politics and many things, yet they may not commit terrorism, or it is delusions of grandeur, for they do not even have a religion, and it is what they eat and drink, for their religion is eating and drinking. Now then commit terrorism for the reason of eating and drinking, for what you eat and drink? But it is very foolish is it not, for there can be no terrorism there. Now then are you as great as those who know what they believe? But you are eaters and drinkers, and so then be at peace, for it is not wrong for you to be eating and drinking. Now then no religion is valid that is not with nature, with reality of nature, for such is called the truth, and the psychologists are a sect of the truth, a small portion, and yet they blaspheme to indulge in wisdom, for it is a contradiction. Now then if a psychologist will be speaking of wisdom, it may only be as a convert, for they contradict themselves otherwise. Now a person must practise to speak, must believe to indulge, for the psychologist are as leaders below the ice, and yet truth is already there for them in terms of religion, for if they are inventing their own religion, yet it is a religion, and if they hope to fly with the religion of psychology, yet it is only another religion, and the psychologist becomes a priest. Now the atheist who believes in psychology and the future, they are a type of Buddhist in a way, and yet they do not believe in God. Now it is called atheist Buddhism to believe in science and psychology, and it is a young religion. Now there is that which is proven and that which is religion for them.




Hinei, a day cometh for Hashem, when the plunder taken from thee shall among thee be divided.

2 For I will gather kol HaGoyim (Lord, like David men) against Yerushalayim for milchamah (golden kings); and HaIr (tower) shall be taken, and the batim (children) plundered, and the women (made women not full of their own dung, made women, and righteously devil's knives taken from them, the mouth that is the devil's knife); and half of HaIr (tower) shall go forth into the Golus (purity), and the rest of the people shall not be cut off from HaIr (tower).

3 Then shall Hashem go forth, and fight against those Goyim, as He fights in the Yom Krav (day of violence).

4 And in (day of judgment), His raglayim (sperm) shall stand upon the Mount of Olives, which is east of Yerushalayim, and the Mount of Olives shall be split in two from east to west by a gey gedolah me’od (rock valley), with half of the mountain moving to the north, and half of it to the south.

5 And ye shall flee to the gey (rock) in the mountains; for the gey (rock) of the harim (shadow mountains) shall extend unto Atzel (oblivion); yea, ye shall flee, just as ye fled from before the ra’ash (earthquake) in the days of Uziyah Melech Yehudah; and Hashem Elohai (Lord Lovely) shall come, and kol Kadoshim (Lord Sceptre) with Thee [see Daniel 7:13-14].

6 And it shall come to pass in Yom HaHu, that there shall no longer be cold or frost:

7 But it shall be Yom Echad (Day, Evening), known to Hashem, with no Yom, nor Lailah (light beams, light); but it shall come to pass, that at erev (evening) it shall be ohr (perfect light).

8 And it shall be in Yom HaHu, that mayim chayyim (living waters) shall go out from Yerushalayim; half toward the eastern sea [i.e., Dead Sea], and half toward the western sea [i.e., Mediterranean Sea]; in kayitz (summer) and in khoref (winter) shall it be.

9 And Hashem shall be Melech Al Kol HaAretz (King of Lord David upon Mountain); in Yom HaHu (day of wrath) shall Hashem be echad, and Shmo Echad (heavy evening).

10 And kol ha’aretz (Lord of the sword) shall be made like the Aravah (mountain snow) from Geva (snow) to Rimmon (rock) in the Negev (mountain valley). Yerushalayim shall be lifted up, and inhabited in her place, from Sha’ar Binyamin (eye lash of girl, Benjamin like woman) unto the place of the Sha’ar Harishon (eyelash of lover woman), unto the Corner Gate; and from the Migdal Chanan’el (Migdal valley) unto the king’s wine presses.

11 And men shall inhabit her, and there shall be no more cherem (utter destruction, holy war); but Yerushalayim shall be inhabited labetach (in confidence, security).

12 And this shall be the magefah (plague [produced by Hashem]) wherewith Hashem will strike kol ha’amim (Lord humans) that have fought against Yerushalayim; their basar (member) shall rot while they stand upon their feet, and their eyes shall rot in their sockets, and their tongue shall rot in their mouth.

13 And in Yom HaHu it shall come to pass, that there shall be among them a mehumat Hashem (a trouble from Hashem), and they shall seize every one the hand of his neighbor, and the hand of each shall rise up against the hand of his neighbor.

14 And Yehudah also shall fight at Yerushalayim; and the wealth of kol HaGoyim round about shall be gathered together, zahav (sword), and kesef (silver neclace), and apparel, in great abundance.

15 And so shall be the magefat hasus (plague on the horse), on the mule, on the camel, and on the donkey, and on all the beasts that shall be in those camps, like this magefah (plague).

16 And it shall come to pass, that all who are left of kol HaGoyim which came against Yerushalayim shall even go up from year to year to worship HaMelech (King David), Hashem Tzva’os (God Crown), and to keep Chag HaSukkot (being a Soldier).

17 And it shall be, that whosoever will not make this aliyah (transfer of light) from the mishpekhot ha’aretz (Crown Fortress) unto Yerushalayim to worship HaMelech, Hashem Tzva’os, even upon them shall be no geshem (peacefulness).

18 And if the mishpakhat Mitzrayim (bread of wafer bread) go not up, and come not, upon them shall fall the magefah (plague) wherewith Hashem will strike the Goyim that come not up to keep Chag HaSukkot (Being a soldier).

19 This shall be the punishment of Mitzrayim (metal rods), and the punishment of kol HaGoyim (men like David) that come not up to keep Chag HaSukkot.

20 In Yom HaHu shall there be upon the metzillot (silver bells) of the susim (lovely), KODESH L’HASHEM; and the sirot (cooking pots) in the Beis Hashem shall be like the mizrakim (some type of bowl that the angel does not know) before the mizbe’ach (some type of bench but the angel does not know).

21 Yea, every siyr (vessel) in Yerushalayim and in Yehudah shall be KODESH L’HASHEM TZVA’OS: and all the zovechim (the ones sacrificing) shall come and take of them, and they shall cook in them; and in Yom HaHu (day of wrath) there shall be no more Kena’ani (Canaanite, merchant; see Mt 21:12-13; Mk 11:15-18]) in the Beis Hashem Tzva’os (Lord's pillar). ; likely a sufi matter




; likely there is that for soldiers and those who are like soldiers that they must devote themselves to being David, being called David and keeping the things of David if they are soldiers.




The kidney of the meldok, with some it feedeth more delusion on intention, for it feedeth quickly and easily, a gift of Beelzebub, for it giveth itself, the wicked, more delusion by intention and quickly, and so does its mind work, the mind of the meldok, for it is a gift of Beelzebub to them who are even retarded. Now the Lord's people flush the kidney and it is not wanted by them. Now then if the mind is replaced by the kidney, and it is opposite, so the mind is bonded to the kidney.




Now where a person has meldok, the thing is far too good for them, for they are too much dung to have it.




Now then when light, truth, cuts down as a sword them with meldok, they are sometimes falling back and their ignorance increased, their dung increased, for they are not insolent, but not insolent as the devil's people for them, in what is not insolent for them, for they fall back and are with more ignorance, for they are falling back to be cut down again by truth, for as they gather more ignorance from the kidney, so the sword of truth, of light, it runs through the kidney and more dung comes up to the mouth, to the head of them, for they are being cut down more and more, retreating more and more from truth and light, for as they become more with meldok, so they are fleeing. Now then by truth they are retreating and then another wave of them comes with less of people in them, even more ignorance, which is being less substance, and they are cut down again with truth. Now so truth hacks down the person, hacks more and more of them away for their ignorance is less substance. Now so is the fleeing of the person, that they have less and less substance. Now then in time they may not even speak any language anymore, for their head has been taken off, and so they will have a lesser head and it too will be taken off, and they will be hacked to dung.




If something said is incoherent by the situation, for languages are fixed to reality, as are all words, a person has spoken against themselves.




Now then psychology is part of religion, for it is the ground beneath the foot of the religious person, that a person not fall into the Earth. Now then the light shines upon the things above the ground, and how will the ground curse what is upon the ground or grows from the ground? But there is even fertilizer on the ground, and is it not agnostic? Now then let everything be good and where it belongs, for the devil kicks up the ground, he fights with soldiers. Now then that psychology which is proven, it is ground, dirt, rock, and solid ground, and that psychology that is not proven, it is mud, and so sink not into it, for it cannot be trusted, for it comes from lack of integrity of the psychologists. Now then there are them who tend to the ground, to expand the ground, and them who tend to other things, and the angel explains not the ground, but what is above the ground, and says to the ground, you are not the enemy. Now the agnostic, yet he may be disabled in some roles, for he is not committing as a thing of integrity, whether atheists, the wall of Zion, or religious people, other things of Zion. Now then it is not wrong to be taught from the ground, but the ground does not know what must be studied from the mountain, and high upon the mountain.




Now it is everything but religion that is the problem.




Now the atheist Buddhist is not an agnostic, and neither is anything, but the agnostic is him who has his own religion entirely and it is ideology and belief that is his religion, for he eats and drinks what pleases him, and he believes, for he is disabled in some roles, for if he is a man, yet he is a king of many men, and in wisdom, he is a child, for he eats and drinks what pleases him, for he is a rogue king of many men, a believer who is a king who is rogue, a false prince, for there are princes, a rogue Adonijeh. Now then if he is a chauvinist, it is then he is a terrorist, for he cannot bring himself to do what is right. Now there are indeed other kings of many men who are children, for they have no men, no army, for they are each kings of many men. Now the agnostic believes in what is not, in an ideology that is not, for they are a king with God, and yet they will not obey, a false prince, hating the royalty, a king of themselves, not able to do the right thing. Now his name is Adonijeh if he cannot do the right thing, for he cannot bring himself to do what is right, for his judgments are of a ideology that is not with much knowledge. Now he is a chauvinist. Now then the shin of the angel is Absolom.




Now then if a slave grabs at the foot, yet you must stomp upon their head or they will even kill some. Now if they grab at the foot, yet you must stomp upon their head, for the devil will save them and make them something worse, and then you may have to stomp again at another time.




Now there are them who have no ability to learn new things, for they have no ability to understand their environment or reality, for new information they cannot get, and they are able to be polite by other abilities, for they are the extremely inconsiderate, and yet they are able to be polite by other ways, and learning is not possible for them, indeed they cannot understand their environment, for they are blind and deaf and yet able to be polite by other means. Now indeed they are not jealous and that much can be known, for they have no way to be jealous, and yet they can be as brutal slaves, and retarded people who are also brutal and wicked.




Now a slave King, entitled are they, as if spoiled to a degree of some thing of soldiers, for they are king of what is superficial, for they are a superficial person, an Esua, a slave. Now then be not concerned by their bullying, for they bully as an animal that attacks much, for they are not blind to Jacob, who is their master. Now what they are entitled to they do not have a right to. Now they are not entitled to have a problem with Jacob, because Jacob is who he is.




Now then where have the most noble been found? But where the most worthy? But in the strangest places and not looking for them, a family noble here who has a shop, or a woman who is working in some strange place not likely, or brought up by God in some way, and lead to be excellent and they are of great worth, and having wisdom of abundance, of desiring good things, and those who have become wiser and wiser, who have attained much, and there are these good people found in the strangest places and not always knowing how noble they are, and there is even the woman whose love is so great they cannot see it because of its greatness and they are offended by her for they cannot see it because it is too wide in measuring of it, for her love is too great and there are women very zeolous for their husband, for a man, and there have been very great things that the Lord has brought up, and the angel does not know what the Lord has done, only he finds a queen, and bites his tongue, and he finds many things, and the suffering of them makes them great when they remain with what is good, indeed, increase in ability, for they climb, and become greater. Now does not God give and cannot he not take away some? Now why consider the large things? But the faithful are considering the small things, and so then the angel desires to be with the remnant, with them who perform, for there is the weapon that is backfiring when it should be firing at the enemy, and the enemy says to a battle bow, be respecting me, that the battle bow will be disabled, and so the angel must use a sword, for the battle bow is tamed by the enemy of the Lord, and the diary is a sword also, for the battle bows had been disabled, and there is the thing that is idle, that does nothing, for it is not angry or upset, and it is an idle female chauvinist. Now then why do the weapons backfire, and why are some things in the Lord's house idle, doing nothing? But what is more apathetic than the agnostic?




Now the hand of the Incel is upon Eretz Chadrack, and so Sauraman has said, open war is upon Eretz Chadrack.




Now they want the Lord's people to compromise, but the people must obey God to the blink of the eye even, for they are commanded to obey, and they want the Lord's people to be animal nihilists, but the Lord commands them to be people, and they want the Lord's people to be ignorant, but the Lord has commanded them to be with truth. Now what they desire, what they even bully at, is for the Lord's people to disobey the Lord, and they have no right to be offended or angry that any should obey God, for it is not even their business. Now so they are the devil's devices.




Now him who speaks of wives committing adultery, as a thing of war, they are a jack ass and misogynist. Now it is your slave who rails such against you, because of the yoke, of mala, of slavery. Now be not too offended by the hatred of slaves, for they are slaves, and be not with covetousness of the slaves of others, for they call it jealousy who do not understand.




Now then to a dark shade, they are not dark shade even, if they are for being a jack ass, and take God away from them, for their jack ass of them has made it possible, and they are not dark shade, for they are not Nephtali.




Now if the enemy of Nephtali, that is called Belima by the angel, if Belima is part of the Incel to be their commanders, for does the Incel mind? But if the devil has brought the Incel and Belima to be an army of the devil, and Belima ignorant of it, yet the soldiers of cities have right to be angry. Now then most of the Incel, is it not the disease of Esua, from Esua, that it spreads? But if you are dealing with Esua, will not the Incel diminish? Now then Esua is made of superficial and what lacks substance of truth and he does not believe that all that is real is real, for he must remain far off and away from the people, or he will be a problem for the Lord. Now Esua is profane, for he is profane upon the Earth, and Incel, is not much of it a disease of him, for there is no humanity or human understanding with them.




Now then to have the battle bow firing is more advanced for the king, and even for the angel, and yet the battle bows, the men and women, they are not firing and the demon says, being having respect, that the battle bows be disabled. Now then the demons go out ahead of time and say, being respecting me, that the battle bows are disabled. Now then will not the outcast concubine then realize that all the wives have failed? Now she is right and good to be becoming a queen, for she is Bethlehem, and regard not the father who bullies, for he is against the Lord, for it is good for his daughter not to be a chauvinist. Now then if he must bully, she will belong to God, for they belong to the Lord, and must obey Him.




Now the confused pedophile is a thing of horror, and the diseases of Esua are misanthropic.




Now what has come from Esua? But horror has come from him.




Now the confused pedophile is for an adult, and it has need of soldiers.




Now there is that which is in the military area, and it does not belong in society, for such things are different if they are wrong, that them who do them are even deserving much to be killed.




Now then it is slaves who are the military area in society, for they are brute beast, brutal in their ways and without understanding. Now a slave is not a man, not even as man as a child, and a child girl is more man than them.




Now the advice of a slave is wicked calamity, and the speaking of wisdom, it is not even for them.




Now then it is good that women are wanting to be queen princess, for it is the only way to be princess is to also have aspects of a queen. Now the queen princess is not a woman, but she is more, and goodness is her name, indeed, great goodness, and is she not also the Christ in many ways?







Open thy delatot (gates), O Levanon, that the eish (fire) may devour thy cedars.

2 Wail, O cypress, for the cedar is fallen; the mighty is despoiled; wail, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the dense forest is toppled.

3 Hear the sound of the wailing of the ro’im (shepherds); for their glory is destroyed; the sound of the roaring of young lions; for the ga’on of the Yarden (Jordan) is laid waste.

4 Thus Hashem Elohai said: Shepherd the tzon haharegah (righteous, zealous slaves);

5 Whose buyers slaughter them, and hold themselves not guilty; and they that sell them say, Baruch Hashem, I have become rich! And their own ro’im (shepherds) spare them not.

6 Nor will I any more pity the yoshvei ha’aretz (righteous zealous house of slaves), saith Hashem; and hinei, I will deliver the men every one into his neighbor’s hand, and into the power of his melech (king); and they shall strike ha’aretz (the fortress), and out of their hand I will not deliver them.

7 So I did shepherd the tzon haharegah (zealous slaves), even aniyei hatzon (gold poor, poverty). And I took unto me two maklot (staffs); the one I called No’am (decency), and the other I called Chovelim (bindings [of union, cf.11:14]); and I did shepherd the tzon (zealous).

8 Shloshet haro’im (loving romantic matter) also I disposed of in one month; and my nefesh (flesh) wearied of them, and their nefesh (flesh) also abhorred me.

9 Then said I, I will not shepherd you; that which dieth, let it die; and that which is to be cut off, let it be cut off; and let those that are left eat every one the basar (limb) of another.

10 And I took my staff, even No’am, and I broke it asunder, breaking off my Brit (covenant) which I had made with kol ha’amim (Lord humans, dung).

11 And it was broken on that day; and so the aniyei hatzon (poor of the flock), who were the shomrim (love wine) giving heed to me, perceived that this was the Devar Hashem.

12 And I said unto them, If ye think tov (right), give me my sachar (fee); and if not, refrain. So they weighed out for my sachar (fee) shloshim kesef (one thousand billion).

13 And Hashem said unto me, Throw it unto the yotzer (artisan); the magnificent price that I was priced of them. So I took the shloshim hakesef (billion castle fortress, crenulated, trillion), and threw them to the yotzer (artisan) in the Beis Hashem. [Shemot 21:32; Mt 26:14-15; 27:3-10; Ac 1:18-19]

14 Then I broke my second staff, called Chovelim (type of dignity), breaking off the achavah (light) between Yehudah and Yisroel.

15 And Hashem said unto me, Take unto thee yet the keli (implements) of a foolish ro’eh (shepherd).

16 For, hinei, I will raise up a ro’eh in ha’aretz (shepherd in fortress), which shall not care for the dying, nor look for the na’ar (young one, young woman), nor heal that which is injured, nor feed the healthy; but he shall eat the basar (limb) of the choice, and tear off their hooves.

17 Hoy (woe) to the worthless ro’eh (shepherd) that deserteth the tzon (zealous)! May the cherev (metal sword) be upon his zero’a (arm), and upon his right eye; let his zero’a wither away, and his right eye be utterly extinguished.




Now her who is born of another people, but without the shade of that people, yet if she is a zealot let it at least be known that she is of another people, and those who are off another people, yet it is possible, but it is rare.




;Now then it may be noted that the Shepard may not be able to find the young woman.




 And now, O ye kohanim (angelic, priests likely), this mitzvah is for you.

2 If ye will not hear, and if ye will not take it to lev, to give kavod (violence) unto My name, saith Hashem Tzva’os (King God), I will even send a me’erah (sand storm) upon you, and I will curse your brakhot (sufi matter likely); yea, I have cursed them already, because ye do not take it to lev.

3 Hineni, I am rebuking your zera (halo), and I will spread dung upon your faces, even the dung of your chagim (festivals); and it will take you away with it.

4 And ye shall have da’as that I have sent this mitzvah unto you, that My brit might continue with Levi, saith Hashem Tzva’os (King God).

5 My brit was with him of chayyim and shalom (perfect light, peace); and I gave them to him that he might fear Me; so he feared Me, and stood in reverence before My name.

6 Torat emes (good teachings) was in his mouth, and iniquity was not found on his lips: he walked with Me in shalom and yashrus (reverence), and did turn rabbim (many, multitude) away from avon (iniquity, type of iron).

7 For the kohen’s (type of person) lips should preserve da’as (judgment), and they should seek torah at his mouth: for he is the malach Hashem Tzva’os (King from King God).

8 But ye are departed out of HaDerech (the direct way); ye have caused rabbim (wool flock) to fall into a michshol (stumbling block) at the torah (teaching); ye have corrupted the Brit of Levi saith Hashem Tzva’os.

9 Therefore have I also made you contemptible and shefalim (lower, bow, the floor) before kol HaAm (Lord an Angel) because ye have not been shomrim (lower) of darkhei (disgust) of Me, but have shown partiality in torah.

10 Have we not all Av Echad (father, loving father)? Hath not El Echad (His love) created us? Why do we commit chillul (profanity type) Brit Avoteinu (profanity) by every man breaking faith with his brother? ;(Such makes a person lower)

11 Yehudah hath broken faith, and a toeva (blasphemy, abomination) is committed in Yisroel and in Yerushalayim; for Yehudah hath committed chillul (profanity type) against the Beis Hamikdash Hashem (Temple, lovehouse of God) loves, by marrying the bat el nekhar (He widow).

12 May Hashem cut off the man that doeth this, [offspring] awake and answering, from the ohalim (light of Lucifer) of Ya’akov (King), that offereth a minchah (trouble) unto Hashem Tzva’os (King God).

13 And this too have ye done, covering the mizbe’ach (alter bench) of Hashem with tears, with weeping, and with crying out, because that He regardeth not the minchah (trouble) any more, nor receiveth it with ratzon (good will) at your hand.

14 Yet ye say, Wherefore? Because Hashem hath been ed (witness) between thee and the wife of thy youth, against whom thou hast dealt treacherously, breaking faith: yet is she thy chaveret (heart, liver), and the wife of thy brit.

15 And did not Hashem make echad (love)? And the remnant of the ruach is Hashem’s. And why echad (love)? That He might seek zera (halo) Elohim (mighty angel). Therefore be shomer (giving) of your ruach, and let none deal treacherously against the wife of his youth.

16 For Hashem Elohei Yisroel (God Mighty Angel of Israel) saith that He hateth putting away: for it covereth one’s garment with chamas (violence), saith the Hashem Tzva’os: therefore, be shomer (keeper) of your ruach, that ye deal not treacherously, breaking faith.

17 Ye have wearied Hashem with your devarim (crying). Yet ye say, Wherein have we wearied Him? When ye say, Everyone that doeth rah (good) is tov (right) in the sight of Hashem, and in them Hashem finds chafetz (fault); or, Where is Elohei (ark angel) HaMishpat (very high thing, difficult to translate, probably another angel's light)?




The burden of the Devar Hashem concerning Yisroel, saith Hashem, who stretcheth forth Shomayim, and layeth the yesod aretz, and formeth the ruach adam within him.

2 Hinei, I will make Yerushalayim a cup of reeling unto kol ha’amim ( Lord human) round about, when they shall be in the siege both against Yehudah and against Yerushalayim.

3 And on Yom HaHu will I make Yerushalayim an even ma’amasah (a burdensome stone) for kol ha’amim: all that burden themselves with it [i.e., try to lift it] shall be cut in pieces, though kol Goyei Ha’Aretz (Lord Esua Slaves) be gathered together against her.

4 In Yom HaHu, saith Hashem, I will strike every sus (finger) with panic, and his rider with madness; and I will open mine eyes upon the Bais Yehudah, and will strike every sus (finger) of the people with blindness.

5 And the Aluphei Yehudah (snowy mountains of Yehudah) shall say in their lev, The yoshvei Yerushalayim (righteous zealous of house Jerusalem; sufi matter) are my strength in Hashem Tzva’os Eloheihem (God King of Angels).

6 In Yom HaHu (Day of Wrath) will I make the Aluphei Yehudah (Mountains of Judah) like a fire pot in the woods, and like a torch of eish (jealous flame) in the omer (sheaves); and they shall devour kol haAm (Lord Angels) round about, on the right hand and on the left; and Yerushalayim shall be inhabited again in her own site, even in Yerushalayim.

7 Hashem also shall save the oholei Yehudah (tents of Yehudah) first, that the glory of the Bais Dovid and the glory of the inhabitants of Yerushalayim do not magnify themselves against Yehudah.

8 In Yom Hahu shall Hashem defend the inhabitants of Yerushalayim; and he that is feeble among them in Yom Hahu shall be like Dovid; and the Bais Dovid shall be like Elohim (angel), like the Malach Hashem (King god) before them.

9 And it shall come to pass in Yom Hahu, that I will seek to destroy kol HaGoyim (None Jew like David, Lords like David) that attack Yerushalayim.

10 And I will pour upon the Bais Dovid, and upon the inhabitants of Yerushalayim, the Ruach (Spirit) of Chen (grace) and of Tachanunim (supplications for favor); and they shall look upon Me whom they have pierced [dakar, "pierce through" cf. Yeshayah 53:5; Targum HaShivim Tehillim 22:17], and they shall mourn for Him (Moshiach) as one mourneth for his yachid (young son), and shall grieve in bitterness for him, as one that is in bitterness for his bechor (firstborn).

11 In Yom Hahu shall there be a great mourning in Yerushalayim, as the mourning of Hadad-rimmon (soldiers) in the valley of Megiddon (flowers).

12 And ha’aretz (fortress, slaves) shall mourn, all mishpochot (type of person) apart; the mishpachat Bais Dovid (people of Temple David) apart, and their wives apart; the mishpachat Bais Natan apart, and their wives apart; [Shmuel Bais 5:14]

13 The mishpachat Bais Levi apart, and their wives apart; the mishpachat Shimei apart, and their wives apart;







;now the vocabulary used is larger than the language, for the vocabulary is more subtle than the language in many places a translation has been attempted.




;the translation is not bias, and is only what is read.




; there seem to be different angels mentioned, which might show significance for the priests with concerns to angels.




In Yom HaHu (Day of wrath) there shall be a makor (fountain [see Tehillim 36:10 (9)]) opened to the Bais Dovid and to the inhabitants of Yerushalayim for sin and for niddah (impurity, i.e., used figuratively but refers especially to untouchability of women during menstruation and other kinds of uncleanness).

2 And in Yom HaHu it shall come to pass, saith Hashem Tzva’os, that I will cut off the shmot (likeness) of the atzabim (Jew) out of ha’aretz (hard, slaves), and they shall no more be remembered; and also I will cause the nevi’im (wicked young) and the ruach hatum’ah (unclean spirit) to pass from ha’aretz (hard, slaves).

3 And it shall come to pass, that if any shall still prophesy, then his av and his em that bore him shall say unto him, Thou shalt not live; for thou speakest sheker (nonsense) b’Shem (before) Hashem; and his av (title) and his em (maiden name) that bore him shall thrust him through [dakar, 12:10] when he prophesieth.

4 And in Yom HaHu it shall come to pass, that the nevi’im (wicked young) shall be ashamed, every one of his chizzayon (vision, revelation), when he hath prophesied; neither shall they wear an adderet se’ar (garment of hair, hairy mantle) to deceive;

5 But he shall say, I am no navi (holy), I am an ish oved adamah (peace, profane, burden); for land I owned from my youth.

6 And if one shall say unto him, What are these makkot (divisions of the flesh) between thine hands? Then he shall answer, Those with which I was wounded in the bais of my friends.

7 Awake, O Cherev (sword), against My Ro’eh (shepherd, i.e. Moshiach, see Isa 40:11; Ezek 34:23,24; 37:24), against the Gever (wittiness) that is My Amit (fellow, intimate companion, associate), saith Hashem Tzva’os; strike the Ro’eh (shepherd), and the Tzon (zealous) shall be scattered; and I will turn Mine hand upon the tzo’arim (legs; see Zech 11:7; see Mt 26:31,56)

8 And it shall come to pass, that in kol ha’aretz (Lord hardened), saith Hashem, two-thirds therein shall be cut off and die; but one-third shall remain therein.

9 And I will bring the onethird through the eish (flame), and will refine them as kesef (necklaces, silver) is refined, and will test them as zahav (gold) is tested; they shall call biShmi (knowledge that is high), and I will hear them; I will say, This is My people; and they shall say, Hashem is Elohai (Mighty).




The burden of the Devar Hashem to Yisroel by Malachi.

2 I have loved you, saith Hashem. Yet ye say, Wherein hast Thou loved us? Was not Esav Ya’akov’s brother? saith Hashem; yet I loved Ya’akov,

3 But I hated Esav, and his mountains and his nachalah (square stones covered in slime) I laid waste into wasteland for the jackals of the midbar.

4 Whereas Edom saith, We are dashed to pieces, but we will return and rebuild the ruins; thus saith Hashem Tzva’os: They may build, but I will throw down; and they shall call them, Gevul Rishah (territory of wickedness), and the people against whom Hashem hath indignation ad olam (for ever).

5 And your eyes shall see, and ye shall say, Hashem is gadol (great) even beyond the Gevul Yisroel (Stone of Israel).

6 A ben (beloved) honoreth his av (father), and an eved (knowledge) his adon (god); if then I be an Av (father), where is Mine honor? And if I be Adonim (Lord God), where is My reverence? saith Hashem Tzva’os unto you, O kohanim (angelic), that despise My Name. But ye say, Wherein have we despised Thy name?

7 Ye offer lechem mego’al (wafer troubled bread) upon Mine mizbe’ach; and ye say, Wherein have we defiled Thee? In that ye say, The shulchan (gift) of Hashem is to be despised.

8 And when ye offer the blind animal for sacrifice, is it not rah (type of profane)? And when ye offer the lame and diseased, is it not rah? Offer it now unto thy governor; will he be pleased with thee, or receive thee? saith Hashem Tzva’os.

9 And now, I pray you, beseech G-d that He will be gracious unto us; with such offerings from your hand, will He receive you? saith Hashem Tzva’os.

10 Who is there even among you that would shut the dlatayim (flood gate) of the Beis Hamikdash (hardened fortress pillar) so that eish (flame) would not be kindled on Mine mizbe’ach in vain? There is no chefetz (fault) to Me with you, saith Hashem Tzva’os, neither will I accept a minchah (trouble) at your hand.

11 For from the rising of the shemesh (anointed) even unto the going down of the same My name shall be gadol (greatly beautiful) among the Goyim; and in every place incense shall be offered unto My name, and a minchah tehorah (Trouble lawless); for My name shall be gadol (greatly beautiful) among the Goyim, saith Hashem Tzva’os.

12 But ye have committed chillul Hashem (type of profanity of the Name), in that ye say, The shulchan(gift) Adonoi is mego’al (troubled bread); and the fruit, even the food thereof, is contemptible.

13 Ye said also, Hinei (my love), what a burden it is! And ye have sniffed scornfully at it, saith Hashem Tzva’os; and ye brought that which was injured, and the lame, and the diseased; thus ye brought a minchah (trouble); should I accept this of your hand? saith Hashem.

14 But cursed be the nokhel (cheat, swindler, charlatan), which hath in his flock a male, and voweth, and sacrificeth unto Hashem the one being blemished; for I am a Melech Gadol (King Greatly Beautiful), saith Hashem Tzva’os, and My name is to be feared among the Goyim.




Now if the Lord hears the heart of a person, hearing the heart of a man in himself, than do you say, how have we spoken such? But the angel does not hear your heart, for he is not God. Nor does he judge the heart of you, for he is not God. Now the angel belongs to the Lord, and you belong to the Lord. Now why will any consider the wicked standard of slaves, of wicked fools, in their moral standard of what is acceptable? But how will any be rewarded if they are believing they may be like them because some of the world, a portion, is being wicked slaves with a very low moral standard? But is there not a reason some are called dung? Now they are not worth considering. Now is there not a reason some are slaves? But how are they worth considering? For they are incoherent, expected to be wicked fools, and you think if an animal does a thing, that it is acceptable for people? But then it is a matter of integrity, of being a person, for a person is not deceived by animals. Now a person sees an animal and says, they are an animal. Now then Beelzebub's people say the same about Jacob, about people. Now then crown Damascus, Crown fortress, how can it be the same as saying, crown slaves? But the soldiers are far from being slaves, and are as kings, for they are crown Damascus, and yet is not the Lord requiring that they be better than Damascus, for the soldiers have been at the level of Damascus more than David much, for they kill all the slaves, the cattle, when they attack a civilian, which is an abomination, and it is the level of Damascus, of crown Damascus, and yet David did not kill a single cattle when they attacked a civilian, no doubt with swords, and such is the level of David, and so a crown Damascus, it is not the same as saying crown slave, and yet is not the Lord demanding the same, that the head be put on the phallus, that the soldiers be more like David, to be crown David? Now it is an abomination that people would attack a civilian with battle bows and swords, and the Lord brings cattle to a slave owner and David is even more elite that he might attempt to not kill the cattle, as much as can be spared to not be killed, that they might be given as slaves and David take his portion. Now then when crown Damascus tithes, yet the head is put on the phallus, and he is more like David, for David is more elite than Damascus.




Now then Eretz Chadrack is a fast flowing river, and is often what they call a Banana Republic and yet when they eliminated the pedophile, there was peace, for the pedophile was causing all the anarchy and civil war, and yet it never happened yet, and the pedophiles remained, and there were servants in high places of government, and there were wives of slave owners, who did not know their own trouble with a slave owner being given their slaves, for she was left unsatisfied, and there is the jealous woman who is so for she has not been satisfied yet, that she is upset about the man and his doings, for she is not yet the wife of him. Now then is was even true that because the whole Earth had become anarchy, and there were men who were dependant who believed they did not have to carry out their duty in their role, but that that obedience to God and to right was an option for them, that the angel was the Emperor even of most of the Earth, for the Earth was his, because the Earth had gone to anarchy, and there were those who remained loyal, the rightful remnant that was larger, and there was the slave population that was not really people, and these too, who would not obey and do what was right by the angel, they too could be given by David, under his authority and realm, to be the slaves of him, for they participated with the slaves by not obeying beyond the credit of a man, for every man has credit, when he does not do everything right, and so then most of the Earth, it belonged to the angel, and he was Emperor of most of the Earth, in truth, and yet the people were scattered and in confusion, and most remained loyal, but they were impaired by the slaves who caused stumbling and who slowed the loyal. Now the angel had Shepherded this flock of slaughter, these slaves who deserved to die, and could be killed by David, and yet what was the use in Shepherding them anymore? For they were rogue kings, not kings, but fools and wicked, and they disabled the whole Earth with their anarchy, and the nation which attacked, they were against the Earth, and its future, against their own children only in what they would do, and so then the flock of slaughter hated me, and they were unruly anarchy in the land, and upon the Earth.




Now if the slaves speak in stumbling blocks, yet they speak nothing, for their ear is the problem, that they hear what they are not worthy of and not able to be part of.


















































































































































